I 

if 

i 








■I 




Duqufsne fllniumityi 




h 

■ 



Digitized by the Internet Archive 

in 2010 with funding from 

Lyrasis Members and Sloan Foundation 



http://www.archive.org/details/fundamentalprincOOaugu 



With a Biographical Preface by Ct 

PROFESSOR BEESLY UD, 



1% 



THE 



FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLES 



OF THE 



POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 




AUGUSTE COMTE 



WATTS & CO., 
17, JOHNSON'S COURT, FLEET STREET, LONDON, E.C. 

ISSUED FOR THE RATIONALIST PRESS ASSOCIATION, LIMITED 



No. 7 of this Series is " THE RELIGION OF WOMAN," 
by JOSEPH MeCABE 



^ 



THE 



FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLES 



OF THE 



POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



BEING THE FIRST TWO CHAPTERS 
OF THE 

"COURS DE PHILO SOPHIE POSITIVE" 



AUGUSTE COMTE 



TRANSLATED BY 

PAUL DESCOURS and H. GORDON JONES 



WITH A BIOGRAPHICAL PREFACE BY 

EDWARD SPENCER BEESLY, M.A. 

Emeritus Professor of History in University College, London 



[ISSUED for the rationalist press association, limited] 



WATTS & CO., 
17, JOHNSON'S COURT, FLEET STREET, LONDON, E.G 

1905 



PREFACE 



Auguste Comte was born at Mont- 
pellier on January 19th, 1798, five years 
after the execution of Louis XVI. His 
father was a revenue officer, of no great 
means. Both parents were Royalists and 
strict Catholics, and it is not known that 
they or any of his relations were distin- 
guished by ability of any kind. He 
was educated at the lycee of his native 
town, where he showed extraordinary 
precocity and ardour for study, but a 
rebellio us disposit ion in matters of disci- 
pline. When only fifteen he came out 
first in the entrance examination to the 
Polytechnic School, but on account of 
his youth was not actually admitted till 
the following year (1S14). Here, under 
the best teachers in France, he studied 
the higher mathematics, physics, and 
chemistry with his usual ardour. In 
1 8 16 (the year after Waterloo) he took 
the lead in a demonstration against an 
unpopular official, and the Government, 
regarding the Polytechnic as a hot-bed 
of republicanism, gladly seized the oppor- 
tunity of dismissing all the students. 
His prospects in the public service were 
thus destroyed, and at the age of 
eighteen he had to support himself by 
giving private lessons in mathematics, 
devoting all his spare time to the study 
of biology and history. 



While still under twenty Comte came 
under the influence of the celebrated 
Saint-Simon, then his senior by forty 
years, who, though destitute of real 
philosophical capacity or scientific 
instruction, was gifted with a fertile 
imagination, and had caught a con- 
fused glimpse of some of the ideas that 
Comte was destined to think out and 
establish. This has led to a needless 
controversy as to the younger man's 
originality. To deal with it here is 
impossible. I am content to quote the 
judgment of Mr. John Morley, who is 
not a Comtist : " The most cursory 
glance into Saint-Simon's writings is 
enough to reveal the thread of connec- 
tion between the ingenious visionary 
and the systematic thinker. We see 
the debt, and we also see that, when it 
is stated at the highest possible, nothing 
has really been taken from Comte's 
claims as a powerful original thinker, or 
from his immeasurable pre-eminence 
over Saint-Simon in intellectual grasp 
and vigour and coherence." Saint- 
Simon saw that theology no longer 
supplied a sufficient basis for social 
order, still less for social progress, and 
that such a basis could only be obtained 
by applying to social phenomena the' 
methods that had successfully created 



NOV 3 136G 



PREFACE 



the simpler sciences. But he and his 
followers had neither the scientific train- 
ing nor the patience to perform this 
work. They preferred the easier course 
of starting fantastic plans of social re- 
organisation suggested only by their 
uninstructed imagination, and they tried 
to bring these into immediate practice 
by fervid and anarchical appeals to 
popular sentiment. 

Comj£__Looked on this as quackery, 
and, while equally bent on social 
regeneration, set himself to lay the 
intellectual foundation fo rit by - c reating 
the science of Sociology ; a work that 
could not have been originally performed 
by anyone not versed in the principal 
doctrines of the simpler sciences, and in 
the methods by which they had been 
established. For this work Comte was 
qualified by the encyclopaedic training 
which, while still a young man, his 
quick apprehension, his prodigious 
memory, and his ardour for study had 
enabled him to acquire. 

His earliest publications were essays 
which appeared in various periodicals. 
Six of them, written between 1819 and 
1828, contain the leading ideas which he 
subsequently co-ordinated and developed 
in his larger works. In one of them, the 
" Plan of the scientific works necessary 
for the Reorganisation of Society," pub- 
lished in 1822, will be found the first 
announcement of the two famous laws of 
the Three States and the Classification 
of the Sciences. These six essays Comte 
reprinted long afterwards as an appendix 
to the fourth volume of the Positive 
Polity, in order to prove, as they most 



clearly do, that the regeneration of 
society had been his aim from the first, 
and that his "fundamental" treatise on 
Positive Philosophy had always been 
meant as preliminary to his " principal " 
treatise on Positive Polity. 

In the spring of 1826 the outlines of 
the Philosophy were already so clearly 
mapped out in his mind that he could 
undertake to expound it orally in a 
course of seventy-two lectures, to be 
completed in twelve months ; a prodi- 
gious effort, since the lectures did not 
exist on paper, and he always spoke 
without notes. It may here be men- 
tioned that each volume of his most 
important works was completely com- 
posed in long meditations without 
putting pen to paper. When this 
mental composition of the volume was 
finished, he wrote it out without pause 
as if he was copying it. The lectures, 
begun in May, 1826, were attended by 
several eminent scientists. According 
to the programme, two were to be intro- 
ductory ; sixteen were allotted to mathe- 
matics ; ten each to astronomy, physics, 
chemistry, and biology; and fourteen 
to social physics, or, as he afterwards 
called it, sociology. 1 But after the third 
lecture the mental strain, aggravated by 
domestic and other quarrels, brought on 
an attack of insanity which lasted for 
some months. In January, 1829, he 
resumed the interrupted course, and 
carried it out successfully in exact 
accordance with the original programme. 



'Comte coined the word "sociologie" in 
1839. See Phil. Pos., chap, xlvii. 



PREFACE 



5 



These oral lectures were a first sketch of 
his famous " fundamental " work, the 
Positive Philosophy, of which the first 
volume appeared in 1830, the sixth and 
last in 1842. Soon afterwards he pub- 
lished his Discourse on the Positive 
Spirit, a little book intended to furnish 
those who are unable to read the larger 
work with its principal conceptions. 1 

The task which Comte had originally 
marked out for himself was divided into 
two undertakings — the one mental, the 
other social. In the first he set him- 
self to co-ordinate the several abstract 
sciences into a philosophical system. 
This having been now accomplished, he 
had next to construct, upon the founda- 
tion so laid, a social and religious 
system ; in other words, the theory of a 
State and a Church fitted to take the 
place of those that were no longer 
capabl e of securing order and progress 
in modemjiurope. This was to be the 
subject of his Positive Polity. But 
before that work could be begun three 
changes, all of them important, though 
in different degree, took place in his life. 

He had contracted an unfortunate 
marriage in 1825. His whole life since 
then had been made miserable by con- 
tinual quarrels with his wife. In 1842 
she left him, as she had several times 
done before. This time he refused to 
let her return. But to the end of his 
life he made her such a pecuniary allow- 
ance as his means permitted, and for 
some years he continued to correspond 

1 Translated, with explanatory notes by E. S. 
Beesly ; cr. 8vo, 2s. net. (W. Reeves, 83, 
Charing Cross Road. ) 



with her. The separation was a pro- 
found relief to him, for their quarrels 
had, in his opinion, prolonged the time 
occupied in the composition of the 
Positive Philosophy by at least a third. 

Comte's philosophy was very dis- 
pleasing to both the theologists and the 
scientific specialists of his time. Their 
influence predominated in the Academie 
des Sciences, andprevented his obtaining 
a mathematical professorship in the 
Polytechnic School, for which he was 
admirably qualified. Always the most 
fiery of men, and incapable of yielding 
to any fear of consequences, Comte 
unwisely denounced his enemies in the 
preface to the last volume of his Positive 
Philosophy, and they very meanly 
retaliated by depriving him, in 1844 
and 1S52, of two mathematical posts 
in the Polytechnic which he had held 
for several years. The present fame 
and influence of Comte rest upon a 
much broader and deeper foundation 
than his services to any branch of 
natural science. But it is worth men- 
tioning that candidates for the degree 
of Licencie es Sciences are now expected 
to show a knowledge of the chapters on 
mathematics in the Positive Philosophy. 

By these successive spoliations, and 
by the loss in 1848 of employment in a 
private school, he would have been 
reduced to destitution if friends had 
not come to his aid. In 1844-5 Mr. 
John Stuart Mill, who had read the 
Positive Philosophy with great admira- 
tion, induced Mr. Grote, Sir W. 
Molesworth, and Mr. Currie to make 
him two donations amounting together 



PREFACE 



X 



to ^240. In 1848 a subscription was 
got up for him, which was continued 
annually to the end of his life. This 
" sacerdotal subsidy," as he called it, pro- 
duced at first ;£i2o, and latterly about 
^300. He was thus enabled to devote 
his time entirely to his philosophic work. 

In October, 1844, Comte made the 
acquaintance of Madame Clotilde de 
Vaux. He was then forty-six ; she was 
thirty. Her life had been blighted by 
marriage with a man who turned out 
badly, became a criminal, and had 
disappeared. She was at this time 
living with her parents. Like Comte, 
she had no child. There was, there- 
fore, a certain similarity in their 
positions. Their more intimate friend- 
ship, which may be dated from April, 
1845, was cut short only eleven months 
later by her death. On his part, there 
was the most ardent love; on hers, 
admiration and friendship, feelings which, 
as she told him from first to last, did 
not amount to love. Divorce not being 
then legalised in France, marriage was 
impossible, and he at first pressed 
her to become his mistress. To this 
she would not consent ; their friendship 
remained a perfectly chaste one ; and at 
length, as he came to feel the value of 
the discipline, he thanked her for having 
imposed it. Before he knew her his 
life, from the sexual point of view, had 
been faulty. Thenceforward it was one 
of strict continence. 

The early death of Madame de Vaux 
only intensified his love and gratitude. 
He found his chief happiness in that 
daily communion with her to which he 



gave the name of prayer. Every morning 
and evening a certain time was devoted 
to this sacred exercise, and every week he 
visited her tomb. All his subsequent 
work he regarded as inspired by her. 
That his love for her had a profound 
effect upon his moral nature is evident. 
It produced the inner change which, in 
the language of Christians, is called 
"conversion." Hitherto, though the 
ultimate object of his speculations had 
been to place morality on a firm basis 
of science, and though, in labouring for 
that end, he had been animated by a 
noble social spirit, he had not professed 
to be a religious teacher, or to set in his 
own person any special example of a 
good life. He was simply a philosopher 
working out a system which he believed 
would be of great benefit to the human 
race. But what he had before recog- 
nised as a philosophical truth — that love 
should be the moving principle of our 
lives — was" now brought home to his 
heart. And this was fruitful of good. 

It was in this period that he executed 
the second of his great works, his 
Positive Polity. His philosophical sys- 
tem was not the least altered, though 
his new experience coloured both 
thought and language. The four volumes 
were published between 185 1 and 1854. 
Vol. IV. contains the proposals for 
social and religious reorganisation. They 
had already been partially set forth in 
two little treatises — the General View of 
Positivism,' 1 published in 1848, and after- 



1 Translated by J. H. Bridges, 2s. 6d. (W. 
Reeves, S3, Charing Cross Road.) 



PREFACE 



wards prefixed to Vol. I. of the Polity, 
and the Catechism of Positive Religion? 
which appeared in 1852. 

Steadily executing the plan of work 
announced in 1842 at the end of the 
Philosophy, Comte next proceeded to 
write his Subjective Synthesis. The first 
and only volume appeared in 1856. On 
September 5th, 1857, he was overtaken 
by death at the age of fifty-nine. 

Comte's tomb is in the cemetery of 
Pere-Lachaise. Positivists from all parts 
of the world meet there on the anniver- 
sary of his death. His apartment, 10, 
Rue Monsieur-le-Prince, is piously pre- 
served, just as he left it, by the Positivist 
Society of Paris, which he founded in 
1848. Information about the London 
Positivist Society will be found in the 
Positivist Review, published monthly 
(3j4d. post free) by W. Reeves, 83, 
Charing Cross Road. 



A translation of Comte's Philosophie 
Positive will perhaps seem to many 
people unnecessary. It will be said that 
everyone, or almost everyone, who may 
desire to study that work will have suffi- 
cient acquaintance with the French lan- 
guage to be able to read it in the original. 
I suspect that this assumption is far from 
being well grounded. A knowledge of 
French which is more or less sufficient 
for enjoying a novel, a play, or a history 
may not carry the reader with sure step 
and unflagging attention through a 



1 Translated by Richard Congreve, 2s. 6d. 
(Kegan Paul & Co.) 



lengthy philosophical work; and, although 
Comte's style is forcible, occasionally 
even pungent and epigrammatic, it must 
be confessed that, for the most part, it is 
ponderous and fatiguing. Sometimes 
so compressed as to be obscure, more 
frequently redundant and verbose, often 
provokingly allusive, it makes demands 
upon the attention which discourage all 
but the most persevering readers. 

These are faults which a translator 
who understands his business can, and 
should, do something to amend. If he 
contents himself with a literal rendering 
of every cumbrous, long-spun sentence, 
he is wasting his labour, for his version 
will be considerably less intelligible and 
attractive than the original. It is essen- 
tial that he should not only be skilled in 
the art of turning the idioms of one 
language into those of another, but that 
he should have made a wide and careful 
study of Comte's other writings, so as 
to be competent to expand what is over- 
compressed, to condense what is verbose, 
and to substitute direct statements for 
indirect allusions. If this is done with 
judgment, the translation will be a boon 
to the English reader, even though he 
may be not unable to read the original. 

The Philosophie Positive is known in 
England chiefly — it may be suspected, 
almost exclusively — through Miss Mar- 
tineau's "Condensed Translation," in 
two volumes. When this first appeared 
in 1853, Comte praised it highly, going 
so far as to say : " My fundamental 
treatise will henceforth be best studied, 
at least by the majority of readers, in 
this unexampled translation, the reading 



8 



PREFACE 



of the original being reserved for theo- 
ricians properly so-called." 1 His exami- 
nation of it, he says, had been " summary 
but sufficient." If he had read it through, 
he would have found that it is not free 
from mistakes, and that the omissions, 
necessarily extensive, often detract from 
the force and completeness of the rea- 
soning. 

In 1852, writing to a young banker, 
Comte had suggested what seems to me 
a better mode of abridging the six 
volumes of the Philosophic Positive than 
that adopted by Miss Martineau. " I 
am very glad that you are so zealously 
studying my Philosophic Positive. But 
I would suggest a quicker and less 
laborious process as regards the first 
three volumes of this fundamental 
treatise. It is only theoricians who will 
need to read the whole of it without 
omitting anything. Practicians, after 
reading the two introductory chapters, 
had better confine themselves to the 
general chapter which begins each of the 
five preliminary sciences — Mathematics, 
Astronomy, Physics, Chemistry, Biology. 
That is enough, and even better, for the 
purpose which you very sensibly des- 
cribe to me. Nevertheless, looking at 
the logical importance of Mathematics, 
I advise you to read, besides the chapter 

1 Tenth letter to M. Tapot. 



dealing with that subject as a grand 
whole, the three treating of Calculation, 
Geometry, and Mechanics as subordi- 
nate wholes. You have thus to read in 
the first volume six chapters, including 
the introduction, and only two chapters 
in each of the two following volumes. 
This preparation will qualify you (as an 
experience of ten years has shown me 
in the case of several practicians) to read 
the whole of the three remaining volumes 
dealing with the science of Society." 1 

The chapters thus selected by Comte 
as essential amount to twenty-five out of 
the sixty contained in the Philosophic 
Positive. It is hoped that an English 
version of them will be gradually com- 
pleted. The present little volume is a 
first instalment. It contains the two 
introductory chapters, the first dealing 
with the Law of Intellectual Evolution, 
the second with the complementary Law 
of Classification ; the two taken together 
forming the basis of the Positive Philo- 
sophy. In the French these two chapters 
have already been published separately 
by Littre. I have carefully compared 
the present translation with the original, 
and can bear testimony to its accuracy. 
I think, too, that it often affords the kind 
of help which I have said is desirable. 
E. S. Beesly. 

* Eleventh letter to M. Deullin. 



TRANSLATORS' NOTE 



The Author's Preface and Part I. were translated by 
Paul Descours. 

The Synoptical Table and Part II. were translated by 

H. Gordon Jones, who also supplied the Analytical Table 

of Contents. 

P. D. 

H. G. J. 

June, igos. 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE 



This course of lectures was first begun 
in April, 1826, and is the outcome of all 
my studies since I left the Polytechnic 
School in 1816. I was only able to 
give a few lectures at that time, because 
I had a serious illness ; but I had the 
honour of having among my audience 
several scientific men of the first rank, 
among whom I may mention MM. 
Alexander von Humboldt, Blainville, 
and Poinsot, members of the Academy 
of Sciences, who were good enough to 
follow the course with unflagging interest. 
However, I gave the whole course last 
winter, the first lecture taking place on 
January 4th, 1829. My audience in- 
cluded MM. Fourier (Perpetual Sec- 
retary of the Academy of Sciences), 
Blainville, Poinsot, and Navier (members 
of the same Academy), also Professors 
Broussais, Esquirol, Binet, etc.; all of 
whom I must here publicly thank for the 
way in which they welcomed this new 
philosophical scheme. 

Encouraged by their approval, I 
thought that this course might with 
advantage be made more widely known, 
and I am giving it again this winter at 
the Royal Athenaeum of Paris, where I 
began the lectures on December 9th. 

The plan of the course has remained 
the same ; but in such a place it was 
necessary to omit some of the develop- 
ments of my course. They are, how- 
ever, given in this work in full just as 
the lectures were delivered last year. 



In order to complete this historical 
account, I must say that some of the 
fundamental ideas expounded in this 
course had already been expressed by 
me, in the first part of a work called 
System of Positive Polity, of which an 
edition of one hundred copies was 
printed in May, 1822, and a larger 
edition afterwards in April, 1824. This 
first part has not yet been formally pub- 
lished, but copies have been presented 
to a large number of European scientists 
and philosophers. It will only be pub- 
lished with the second part, which will, 
I hope, appear towards the end of 
1830. 

I have thought it necessary here to 
state the facts as to the publicity of this 
first work, because some ideas which 
somewhat resemble mine are expounded 
in several works which have been since 
published, especially as regards the 
renovation of social theories, though 
no mention is made of my researches. 
Although the history of the human mind 
shows that different persons may, quite 
independently, arrive separately at similar 
conclusions while working at the same 
kind of studies, yet I am obliged to 
insist on the real priority of a work little 
known by the world, because it might 
otherwise be thought that I had found 
the germ of certain ideas in writings 
which are really more recent than 
mine. 

As I have on several occasions been 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE 



asked for some explanations referring to 
the title of this course, I think it may be 
useful to briefly explain it. 

The expression positive philosophy is 
constantly used throughout this course, 
and always with strictly the same mean- 
ing. I think, therefore, it would be 
superfluous to define it otherwise than 
by the uniform use I have made of it. 
The whole of the first chapter in parti- 
cular may be considered as a develop- 
ment of the exact definition of what I 
mean by the phrase "positive philo- 
sophy." 

I regret, however, to have been obliged 
to employ, for want of another, a word 
like philosophy, which has been so im- 
properly used in a multitude of different 
meanings. But the qualifying adjective 
positive appears to me to clearly prevent 
any misconception, at all events on the 
part of those who know its proper mean- 
ing. I will, therefore, in this Preface 
simply say that I use the word philosophy 
in the sense in which it was employed 
by the ancients, and especially by 
Aristotle, as comprising the general 
system of human conceptions; and by 
adding the word positive I wish to denote 
that I am considering that particular 
manner of philosophising which holds 
that the pur pose of theorie s, in any class 
of ideas, is to co-ordin ate facts. This is 
the" third and last state of general philo- 
sophy, the first being theological, and 



the second metaphysical, as I shall 
explain in the first chapter. 

There is no doubt a good deal of 
analogy between my Positive Philosophy 
and what English scientists, especially 
since the time of Newton, mean by 
" natural philosophy." But I was unable 
to use the latter phrase or the term 
" philosophy of the sciences," which 
would be perhaps still more precise, 
because neither of them is yet under- 
stood to include all classes of pheno- 
mena. On the other hand, the Positive 
Philosophy, by which I understand the 
study of social phenomena as well as of 
all others, refers to a uniform mode of 
reasoning on all subjects open to human 
investigation. Besides, the expression 
" natural philosophy " is used in England 
to designate the different sciences of 
observation, considered in the greatest 
detail ; while by Positive Philosophy as 
compared to the Positive Sciences, I 
mean only^ the speci al study_ of the 
generalities of th^ different sr iVnrpo: — 
looked_jjponasfoJpjving_on^ method 
and as constituting the different parts of 
a generaT~scheme of researches. The 
expression which I have been led to 
construct is, therefore, both wider and 
more restricted than the other two 
expressions, which, being analogous as 
to the fundamental character of the 
ideas, might at first sight be considered 
as equivalent. 



Paris, December i8th, 18-9. 



AUGUSTE COMTE. 



SYNOPTICAL TABLE 

Of the Whole Course of Positive Philosophy by Auguste Comte (former 
Pupil of the Polytechnic School). 1 



Lec- 
tures. 

general consider- 
ations . . 2 



f 



Mathematics 



/■Astronomy 



Physics 



Chemistry 



Explanation of the object of this course, or general con- 
siderations on the nature and importance of the Posi- 
\tive Philosophy. 
2. Explanation of the plan of this course, or general con- 



siderations on the hierarchy of the Positive Sciences. 



'Philosophical considerations on Mathematics as a whole 



Lec- 
tures. 



Lec- 
tures. 



J 



General considerations on - 



The Calculus 



It 



G °™'" t 



Rational Mechanics 



I 
'Philosophical considerations on Astronomy as a whole 



General considerations onJ 



Geometrical phenomena 



Mechanical phenomena.. 



Physiology . . 12' 



^•Considerations on positive Cosmogony . . . . . . 1 

..Philosophical considerations on Physics as a whole . . 1 

J r Barology 1 

J I Thermology ,. .. ..2 

9| General considerations on J Acoustics .. .. .. .. 1 

I Optics .. .. .. ..2 

» \ Electricity 2 

f General considerations on Chemistry as a whole . . . . r 

gA 1 Inorganic Chemistry . . . . 3 

I General considerations on J 

v. { Organic Chemistry . . . . 2 

..Philosophical considerations on Physiology as a whole . . 1 

.The structure and composition of 

j living bodies . . . . . . 1 

r«-_- 1 -j .- I The classification of living bodies 1 

General considerations on^ The 0r g anic Life * _ . 2 

I The Animal Life . . . . . . 3 

'•The Cerebral Functions . . 4 



General view of Mathematical Analysis 

The Calculus of Direct Functions 

The Calculus of Indirect Functions 
. The Calculus of Variations. . 

The Calculus of Finite Differences 
.1. General view of Geometry .. 
j 2. Geometry of the Ancients . . 
' 3. Fundamental conception of Analytical 
Geometry 

General study of lines 

General study of surfaces 

Fundamental principles of Mechanics 

General view of Statics 

General view of Dynamics 

General theorems of Mechanics 

General exposition of methods of observa 

tion 
Study of the elementary geometrical pheno 

mena 
Theory of the earth's movement . . 
The laws of Kepler .. 
Law of Universal Gravitation 
Philosophical estimate of this law 
Explanation of celestial phenomena by 

this law 



1. Experimental study of the phenomena of 

heat 1 

2. Mathematical theory of these phenomena 1 



1 1. General view of Inorganic Chemistry 
■1 2. The doctrine of Definite Proportions 
1 3. The Electro-chemical theory 



1. Examination of the older theories 

2. Explanation of the positive theory 



Introduction 
Method . . 



Lec- 
tures. 



Social Physics 15 



General Summary 
and Conclusion 3 



1. General considerations on the necessity and opportuneness of Social Physics 

2. Examination of the principal attempts made hitherto to establish such a science 

1. Characteristics of the Positive Method in its application to social phenomena 

2. The relations of Social Physics to the other sciences _ 

/'Considerations on the general structure of human societies . . 

The fundamental natural law of the development of the human species as a whole 
r r Fetichism 

Historical study of the progress! Theologies stage . . (Po^heta . . ... 

of civilisation. j Metaphysical stage 

{.Positive stage .. • •• • •• 

1. Summary of the Positive Method. 

2. Summary of the Positive Doctrine. 

3. Future of the Positive Philosophy. 



Doctrine 



1 This Table represents the oral course, which was in seventy-two lectures, and not the written course, which is in sixty. 



II 



ANALYTICAL TABLE OF CONTENTS 



Part I. 



THE NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



1-3. Preliminary considerations. 

4. The Law of the Three States : Theo- 

logical, Metaphysical, Positive. 

5. Character of the Theological State. 

6. „ „ Metaphysical State. 

7. „ „ Positive State. 

8. The final stage of each of the three 

systems of Philosophy. 

10. Truth of the Law proved by the history 

of the sciences. 

11. Individual experience as a proof of the 

Law. 

12. The necessity for the Three States can 

also be shown as a matter of theory. 
13-14. It is necessary to observe facts in 
order to form a theory ; and, on the 
other hand, it is equally necessary to 
haveatheory in order to observefacts. 

15. Hence the necessity for the theological 

character of the primitive philosophy. 

16. Theological philosophy is also specially 

suited to the character of the primi- 
tive mind, which prefers to discuss in- 
soluble and inaccessible questions. 

17. This form of philosophy afforded a 

powerful stimulus to early research. 

18. Such a stimulus was absolutely neces- 

sary at first, although now no longer 
needed. 

20. The theological form of philosophy was 

therefore necessary as a provisional 
method and doctrine. 

21. It was impossible to pass directly from 

the Theological to the Positive 
state ; the transition was effected by 
the Metaphysical state. Character 
of this transition. 

22-23. The Positive Philosophy rejects the 
search into ultimate causes, and 
confines itself to the investigation of 
laws. 

24. The Law of Gravitation as an example 
of scientific law. 



25. Fourier's researches on Heat as another 
example. 

26-27. The various sciences have passed 
through the three states at different 
rates. The order in which the 
sciences reached the positive state 
is as follows : Astronomy, Physics, 
Chemistry, and Physiology. This 
order is determined by the degree 
of generality, of simplicity, and in- 
dependence of the respective pheno- 
mena. 

28. History of the Positive Philosophy. 

29. The growing influence of this philo- 

sophy accompanied by the deca- 
dence of the two other forms of philo- 
sophy. The Positive Philosophy is 
destined to prevail universally. 

30. It does not, however, yet embrace all 

classes of phenomena. 

31. Social phenomena are still treated 

by theological and metaphysical 
methods. 

32. The Positive Philosophy must, there- 

fore, be completed by the addition of 
a new science — Social Physics. The 
first and special aim of this work is 
to found such a science. 

33. With this addition the Positive Philo- 

sophy will acquire the character of 
universality. It will therefore be 
able to completely displace its two 
rivals. 

34-35. The second and general aim of this 
work is to constitute a philosophy of 
the sciences by exhibiting them as 
branches of a single trunk. 

36. The course will be one on Positive 
Philosophy, and not on the Positive 
Sciences. Only the methods, chief 
results, and mutual relations of the 
sciences will be considered, not their 
details. 



I 5 



i6 



ANALYTICAL TABLE OF CONTENTS 



37. The two aims of this work are insepar- 

able, although distinct. Without 
Social Physics the Philosophy would 
be incomplete ; on the other hand, 
Social Physics must be based upon 
the other sciences. 

38. No fundamental science must, there- 

efore, be omitted from our study. 
I The present development of the 
sciences is due to the division of 
intellectual labour among scientists. 

41. But this division has its drawbacks, for 

it gives rise to excessive specialisa- 
tion. 

42. The remedy for this evil is the creation 

of a new class of students. Their 
business would be to deal with the 
generalities of science. They would 
connect the various special dis- 
coveries with the general system. 

43. The principle of division of labour 

would, therefore, be carried a step 
further, since the mutual relations of 
the sciences would thus give rise to 
a new order of specialists. 
45. Four general advantages of the Positive 
* Philosophy. 

A6* (1) First advantage — it exhibits the 
\_s logical laws of the human mind. 

47. Every living being has two aspects — 

the Statical and Dynamical. 

48. Application of this fact to intellectual 

phenomena. Psychology must be 
based on Physiology, and on a study 
of scientific theories viewed as intel- 
lectual products. 
49,. The unsoundness of introspective 



X psychology. 

-52. 



50-52. This kind of psychology is based on 
y/ an illusion. The organ observed 
and the observing organ being 
identical, no proper observations 
can be made. 

53. Introspective psychology is also self- 

contradictory. 

54. There is no agreement among its 

followers. 

55. What little we owe to these men is due 

to their being unfaithful to their own 
method. 

56-57. To understand the Positive Method 
properly we must study its applica- 
tions in the various sciences. 

58. Such study is essential for the forma- 
tion of good intellectual habits. 



< 59V The first great result of the Positive 
\ \ Philosophy is, then, to give us a 
Ns — ' knowledge of intellectual laws and 

sound rules for the investigation of 

truth. 

60. (2) A second advantage resulting from 

it will be the regeneration of Educa- 
tion. 

61. The present system of teaching the 

sciences is too specialised. What is 
wanted is a knowledge of the chief 
methods and results of the sciences. 

62. (3) Third advantage — the progress of 

the sciences will be advanced by 
combining them. 

63. Many problems need for their solution 

a combination of two or more 
sciences. 

64. Descartes's discovery of Analytical 

Geometry — e.g., was due to a combi- 
nation of Geometry with Algebra. 

65-66. Further example — many chemical 
problems need a union of Physiology 
with Chemistry. 

68. (4) Fourth advantage — a solid basis will 
be provided for the Reorganisation of 
Society. 

69-70. The Social Order rests upon Ideas 
or Opinions. But there is a lack of 
agreement upon First Principles. 

^ Hence the prevalent social disorder.- 

ffs This disorder is due to the simulta- 
^v/yj^ neons existence of three incom- 

<sn^ Cte>atible philosophies — the theological, 

^ ^^metaphysical, and the positive. The 
v 1 Positive Philosophy is destined to 

nJ° prevail. We have only to complete 
it by the addition of Social Physics. 

72. It has discredited its rivals completely. 

75. All attempts at the universal explana- 

tion of phenomena by a single law 
are chimerical. 

76. It will therefore be impossible to obtain 

scientific perfection in this respect. 
Even the law of gravitation, e.g., 
cannot give us scientific unity. 

77. The only necessary Unity is that of 

Method. It is sufficient that the 
doctrine should be ko»iogeneous. 

78. The object, general character, and 

influence of the Positive Philosophy 
have now been described. 

79. The next step is to determine the 

general plan of the work. 



ANALYTICAL TABLE OF CONTENTS 



17 



Part II. 



THE CLASSIFICATION OF THE SCIENCES 



1-2. All existing Classifications of the 
Sciences are defective. 

3. This is partly due to ignorance of the 

sciences on the part of the classifiers. 
The chief reason is, however, the 
want of homogeneity in the intellec- 
tual system. The first condition of 
success was that all our principal 
conceptions should become positive 
in character. 

4. This condition has now been fulfilled. 

5. The True Principle of Classification. 

6. Our classification must be based upon 

the mutual dependence of the 
sciences. This dependence results 
from that of the corresponding 
phenomena with which the sciences 
deal. 

7. The limits of the proposed classifica- 
-— tion must first be determined. 

f8\ Human knowledge is divided into two 
^-J branches — Theoretical and Prac- 
tical. This inquiry deals only with 
Theoretical knowledge. 
9. A knowledge of the laws of phenomena 
enables us to act effectively upon 
nature. Science is, therefore, the 
. basis of the Arts. 

10. But Science has the still more impor- 
- _• tant function of satisfying our mental 

craving to know the laws of pheno- 
mena. 

11. The study of science for its own sake 

has in the past led to numerous 
improvements in the Arts. 

12. We are concerned here only with 

Theory, leaving its practical appli- 
cations on one side. 

13. To unite the generalities of both 

Theory and Practice in the same 
course would at present be out of 
the question. The special theories 
of the Arts have, in fact, not yet been 
formed. 

14. The class of engineers has to settle the 

relations between Theory and Prac- 
tice. But scientific theories of the 
Arts are as yet incoherent and 
scattered. 

15. Every Art needs a combination of 

several Sciences. Hence the true 



16-17. 



< 



theories of the Arts must be a future 
consequence arising out of the con- 
struction of the Positive Philosophy. 
We must further distinguish two 
classes of natural Sciences — the 
Abstract and Concrete. We are 
concerned only with the Abstract 
Sciences. 
18-19. Physiology, e.g., will be dealt with, 

but not Botany or Zoology. 
20. Chemistry comes into our scheme, but 

not Mineralogy. 
21-23. The Concrete Sciences, like the 
Theories of the Arts, are based upon 
the Abstract Sciences. They must 
therefore be omitted. 
'24!) General conclusion — Theory alone 
■S concerns us in this work, and Theory 
of an Abstract kind only. 
25. The next step is to classify the Sciences. 
26-27. O ur classification cannot be a per- 
fect one. 
Reasons for this necessary imperfec- 
tion. The Historical and Dogmatic 
methods of studying a science. 
Nature of the Historical Method. 
Nature of the Dogmatic Method. 
New sciences must be studied by the 

Historical Method 
The more advanced sciences only admit 
of the Dogmatic Method being used. 
Example of the two Methods — the 
education of an ancient geometer 
compared with that of a modern 
geometer. 
34^The Dogmatic Method is constantly 
*-"■' superseding the other method. 

35. It places even an average intellect in 

possession of all the work of past 
generations. 

36. Sciences in an advanced state must be 

learned by a use of the Dogmatic 
Method, combined with the Histori- 
cal Method in the case of the most 
recent discoveries. 

37. The Dogmatic Method does not show 

how the sciences were built up, but 
that is also true of the ordinary 
Historical Method. 
38-39. The true history of the progress of 
a science belongs to Social Science. 

C 



28. 



29. 
30- 
3i- 

32. 

33- 



ANALYTICAL TABLE OF CONTENTS 



40. No science can be properly understood 
apart from its history. Therefore 
the subject will be treated inciden- 
tally throughout the course. The 
true study of the history of the 
sciences is, however, reserved for 
Social Physics. 

42. It is impossible to adhere strictly to the 

historical order in an exposition of 
the sciences, for an earlier often 
borrows from a later science. 

43. Astronomy and Physics as an example. 

44. Such defects are due to the artificial 

element in our classification. 

45. The classification, however, agrees in 

ethe main with the history of science. 
47. There are 720 possible ways of 
arranging the six fundamental 
sciences. The problem is to find 
the one order which fulfils the neces- 
sary conditions. 

48. The true principle of classification must 

be obtained by a comparison of the 
different order of phenomena with 
which these sciences deal. 

49. So compared, we find that the sciences 

can be arranged in an order of 
mutual dependence. This order is 
determined by the degree of simpli- 
city or generality of the respective 
phenomena. 

50. The most simple are necessarily also 

the most general phenomena. The 
order is, then, from the most simple 
or general to the most complex and 
special phenomena. 

51. The simplest sciences, being the 

furthest removed from the human 
order, have naturally been the 
earliest to develop. 

52. We can now proceed to the actual 

construction of the encyclopaedic 
scale. 

53. Two classes of phenomena — Inorganic 

and Organic. 

54. Organic phenomena are more complex 

and less general than Inorganic. 
They also depend upon the Inor- 
ganic. Therefore, the study of 
Inorganic phenomena must precede 
the other. 

55. This division into Inorganic and 

Organic will not be affected by any 
further modification of our views as 
to the nature of living bodies, should 
such take place. 

56. In any case, we know that the one 

order of phenomena depends upon 
the other. 
58. Inorganic Physics must be divided 



into Astronomy and Terrestrial 
Physics. 

59. Nature of Astronomical phenomena. 

Their study must precede that of 
Terrestrial Physics. 

60. Terrestrial Physics must be further 

divided into Physics proper and 
Chemistry. Chemical phenomena 
are more special than physical. 
Physics must, therefore, precede 
Chemistry. 
61-62. Organic phenomena are divided 
into those relating to the individual 
and those dealing with the species. 
In the case of Man this distinction 
is a fundamental one. Hence 
Organic Physics is divided into 
Physiology proper and Social 
Physics. 

63. Social Physics is not a mere appendage 

to Physiology. Although based 
upon Physiology, it is a separate 
science. Social laws cannot be 
deduced from physiological ones. 

64. Physiology can be divided into vege- 

table and animal. But for our 
present purpose this division is 
inapplicable. 

65. Physiology, therefore, will be regarded 

as a single science in this work. 

66. Hence the order of the sciences is — 

Astronomy, Physics, Chemistry, 
Physiology, and Social Physics. 
This order exhibits a regular grada- 
tion from the most general, simple, 
and abstract phenomena to the 
most special, complex, and concrete. 

67. The sub-divisions of each science may 

also be arranged on the same prin- 
ciple. 

68. The chief characteristic properties of 

this classification are four in number. 

69. (1) This classification agrees with the 

existing empirical classification 
which has spontaneously arisen 
among scientists. 

70. Such an accordance is the surest sign 

of a good classification. 

71. But the accordance does not in the 

least degree make the performance of 
our encyclopaedic task unnecessary. 

72. (2) This classification follows the 

historical order of development of 
the sciences. 
T2,- That order was necessitated by the 
fact that the later sciences could not 
be constituted, until a considerable 
development of the earlier ones, 
upon which they depended, had 
taken place. 



ANALYTICAL TABLE OF CONTENTS 



74. It is impossible to verify the Law of 

the Three States properly unless we 
combine it with this encyclopaedic 
formula. 

75. (3) This classification marks the degree 

of perfection of each science. 

76. The most perfect sciences are those 

which are least dependent on the 
other sciences, and vice versd. 
TJ. The great means of perfecting a science 
is Mathematical Analysis. The 
sciences admit of the application of 
Mathematics in proportion as they 
are occupied with very simple and 
general phenomena. 

78. The difference between the degree of 

precision which a science admits of 
and its certainty. A1F the sciences 
are equally certain ; they only differ 
in their degree of precision. 

79. (4) This classification furnishes us with 

the plan of a really Scientific Educa- 
tion — -general and special. 

80. (a) The effect of the classification on 

Doctrine. No science can be 
properly studied without a know- 
ledge of the sciences preceding it 
in our classification. This principle 
is especially applicable to the case 
of the special education of scientists. 

81. Examples of the need for an orderly 

study of the sciences. 

82. At present a really rational scientific 

education does not exist. Hence 
the imperfect condition of the more 
important sciences. 

83. The need for this orderly study is just 

as necessary in respect of general 
education. 

84. ip) We must consider the encyclopaedic 

formula from the standpoint of 
Method as well as Doctrine. 

85. The proposed course will result in 

giving us a perfect knowledge of the 
Positive Method. 

86. By studying the sciences in the pro- 

posed order, we shall obtain a know- 
ledge of the various modifications 
which the general Positive Method 
undergoes. 

87. Although the general method is the 

same in all cases, each science con- 
tributes a special development of its 
characteristic procedures. 



88. A study of all the fundamental sciences 
is therefore indispensable. 

8g. Not only must all the sciences be 
studied, but they must also be 
studied in their proper order. 

90. The importance of the proposed classi- 

fication has now been dealt with 
under four aspects. 

91. But Mathematics has been omitted 

from the scale of the sciences. 

92. This omission was intentional, on 

account of the extreme importance 
of that science. Its general charac- 
ter and encyclopaedic rank will form 
the subject of the next chapter. 
The general conclusions of that 
chapter are, however, given here. 

93. Mathematics is not a mere part of 

natural philosophy; it is really its 
basis. It is of more importance as 
Method than as Doctrine. 

94. It must be divided into Abstract 

Mathematics, or the Calculus, and 
Concrete Mathematics. Concrete 
Mathematics consists of General 
Geometry and Rational Mechanics. 

95. Abstract Mathematics is purely instru- 

mental. Geometry and Mechanics 
are true natural sciences. But they 
are more important as Method than 
as Doctrine. 

96. Mathematics must be placed at the 

head of the Positive Philosophy. 
This is in accordance with our 
general principle of classification. 
This science has long been the 
starting-point of a scientific educa- 
tion. We now see the rational 
grounds for this practice. 

97. The plan which must guide us in our 

study of Positive Philosophy has 
now been laid down. The true 
encyclopaedic formula which we 
must follow is, therefore — Mathe- 
matics, Astronomy, Physics, Chemis- 
try, Physiology, and Social Physics. 

98. This chapter has then justified the 

preceding Synoptical Table. In 
constructing this Synoptical Table, 
the sub-divisions of each science 
have been arranged in accordance 
with the same principle of classifica- 
tion which furnished the encyclo- 
paedic scale itself. 



The Fundamental Principles of the 
Positive Philosophy 



Part I. 



EXPLANATION OF THE OBJECT OF THIS 
COURSE, OR GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS ON 
THE NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE 
POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



i. The object of this first chapter is to 
indicate clearly the purpose of the course, 
by an exact determination of the spirit 
in which we shall consider the various 
fundamental branches of natural philo- 
sophy, set forth in the preceding Synop- 
tical Table. 

2. It is true that the nature of this 
course can only be completely realised, 
so as to enable us to form a definite 
opinion of it, when its different parts 
have been developed in due order. 
That is the usual disadvantage of defini- 
tions relating to very extensive systems 
of ideas, when the definition precedes 
the exposition. But general principles 
may be conceived under two aspects — 
either as the sketch of a doctrine which 
it is proposed to establish, or as the sum- 
mary of an already-established doctrine. 
It is true that it is only from the last 
. point of view that they acquire their full 
value, yet they already possess under the 
first aspect an extreme importance, since 
they serve to characterise from the out- 



set the subject to be considered. The 
general limitation of the field of our re- 
searches — carried out with the utmost 
strictness — is a preliminary mental 
operation, which is especially necessary 
in a study so vast, and hitherto so in- 
determinate, as that which we are about 
to undertake. In order to comply with 
this logical necessity, I think it neces- 
sary to begin by at once pointing out 
the series of fundamental considerations 
which gave rise to this course ; they will 
be subsequently specially developed with 
all the detail which their great impor- 
tance demands. 

3. In order to explain properly the 
true nature and peculiar character of the 
Positive Philosophy, it is indispensable 
that we should first take a brief survey 
of the progressive growth of the human 
mind, viewed as a whole ; for no idea 
can be properly understood apart from 
its history. 

4. In thus studying the total develop- 
ment of human intelligence in its different 



21 



22 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



spheres of activity, from its first and 
simplest beginning up to our own time, 
I believe that I have discovered a great 
fundamental Law, to which the mind is 
subjected by an invariable necessity. 
The truth of this Law can, I think, be 
demonstrated both by reasoned proofs 
furnished by a knowledge of our mental 
organisation, and by historical verifica- 
tion due to an attentive study of the 
past. This Law consists in the fact that 
each of our principal conceptions, each 
branch of our knowledge, passes in suc- 
cession through three different theoretical 
states : the The ological or fict itious state, 
the Meta physica l or abstra ct state, and 
the Scie ntific or po sitive state. In other 
words, the human mind — by its very 
nature — makes use successively in each 
of its researches of three methods of 
philosophising, whose characters are 
\ essentially different, and even radically 
lopposed to each other. We have first 
Ithe Theological method, then the Meta- 
physical method, and finally the Positive 
method. Hence there are three kinds 
of philosophy or general systems of 
conceptions on the aggregate of 
phenomena, which are mutually ex- 
clusive of each other. The first is 
the necessary starting-point of human 
intelligence: the third represents its 
fixed anjLdefinitive state : theTecond is 
only destined to serve as a transitional 
method. 

5. In the Theological state, the human 
mind directs its researches mainly towards 
the inner nature of beings, and towards 
the first and final causes of all the pheno- 
mena which it observes — in a word, 
towards Absolute knowledge. It there- 
fore represents these phenomena as 
being produced by the direct and con- 
tinuous action of more or less numerous 
supernatural agents, whose arbitrary 



intervention explains all the apparent 
anomalies of the universe. 

6. In the Metaphysical state, which is 
in reality only a simple general modifi- 
cation of the first state, the supernatural 
agents are replaced by abstract forces, 
real entities or personified abstractions, 
inherent in the different beings of the 
world. These entities are looked upon 
as capable of giving rise by themselves 
to all the phenomena observed, each 
phenomenon being explained by assign- 
ing it to its corresponding entity. 

7. Finally, in the Positive state, the 
human mind, recognising the impossi- 
bility of obtaining absolute truth, gives 
up the search after the origin and destina- 
tion of the universe and a knowledge of 
the final causes of phenomena. It only 
endeavours now to discover, by a well- 
combined use of reasoning and observa- 
tion, the actual laws of phenomena — 
that is to say, their invariable relations 
of succession and likeness. The explana- 
tion of facts, thus reduced to its real 
terms, consists henceforth only in the 
connection established between different 
particular phenomena and some general 
facts, the number of which the progress 
of science tends more and more to 
diminish. 

8. The Theological system arrived at 
its highest form of perfection, when it 
substituted the providential action of a 
single being, for the varied play of the 
numerous independent gods which had 
been imagined by the primitive mind. 
In the same way, the last stage of the 
Metaphysical system consisted in re- 
placing the different special entities by 
the idea of a single great general entity 
— Nature — looked upon as the sole 
source of all phenomena. Similarly, 
the ideal of the Positive system, towards 
which it constantly tends, although in 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 23 



all probability it will never attain such 
a stage, would be reached if we could 
look upon all the different phenomena 
observable as so many particular cases 
of a single general fact, such as that of 
Gravitation, for example. 

9. This is not the place to give a 
special demonstration of this funda- 
mental Law of Mental Development, and 
to deduce from it its most important con- 
sequences. We shall make a direct 
study of it, with all the necessary details, 
in the part of this work relating to social 
phenomena. 1 I am only considering it 
now in order to determine precisely the 
true character of the Positive Philosophy, 
as opposed to the two other philosophies 
which have successively "dominated our 
whole intellectual system up to these 
latter centuries. For the present, to 
avoid leaving entirely undemonstrated 
so important a law, the applications of 
which will frequently occur throughout 
this work, I must confine myself to a 
rapid enumeration of the most evident 
general reasons which prove its exactitude. 

10. In the first place, it is, I think, 
sufficient merely to enumerate such a 
law for its accuracy to be immediately 
verified, by all those who are fairly well 
acquainted with the general history of 
the sciences. For there is not a single 
science which has to-day reached the 
Positive stage, which was not in the past 
— as each can easily see for himself — 
composed mainly of metaphysical abstrac- 

1 Readers who desire to have a fuller explana- 
tion of this subject, without delay, may consult 
with advantage three articles entitled "Philo- 
sophical Considerations on the Sciences and 
Men of Science," which I published in November, 
1825, in a journal called the Producer (numbers 
seven, eight, and ten), and especially the first 
part of my System of Positive Polity, addressed 
in April, 1824, to the Academy of Sciences, 
where I placed on record for the first time my 
discovery of this Law. 



tions, and, going back further still, it was 
altogether under the sway of theological 
conceptions. Unfortunately, we shall 
have to recognise on more than one 
occasion in the different parts of this 
course, that even the most perfect sciences 
still retain to-day some very evident 
traces of these two primitive states. 

11. This general revolution of the 
human mind can, moreover, be easily 
verified to-day, in a very obvious, although 
indirect, manner, if we consider the 
development of the individual intelli- 
gence. The starting-point being neces- 
sarily the same in the education of the 
individual as in that of the race, the 
various principal phases of the former 
must reproduce the fundamental epochs 
of the latter. Now, does not each of 
us_in contemplating his own history 
recollect that he has been successively — 
as regards the most important ideas — a 
theologian in childhood, a metaphysician 
in youth, and a natural philosopher in 
manhood ? This verification of the law 
can easily be made by all who are on a 
level with their age. 

12. But, in addition to the proofs of 
the truth of this law furnished by direct 
observation of the race or the individual, 
I must, above all, mention in this brief 
summary the theoretical considerations 
which show its necessity. 

13. The most important of these con- 
siderations arises from the very nature of 
the subject itself. It consists in the need 
at every epoch of having some theory to 
connect the facts, while, on the other 
hand, it was clearly impossible for the 
primitive human mind to form theories 
based on observation. 

14. All competent thinkers agree with 
Bacon that there can_be no real know- 
ledge except"' That which rests upon 
observed facts! This fundamental 



24 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



maxim is evidently indisputable if it is 
applied, as it ought to be, to the mature 
state of our intelligence. But, if we con- 
sider the origin of our knowledge, it is no 
less certain that the primitive human 
mind could not, and indeed ought not 
to, have thought in that way. For if, on 
the one hand, every Positive theory must 
necessarily be founded upon observa- 
tions, it is, on the other hand, no less 
true that, in order to observe, our' mind 
has need of some theory or other. If in 
contemplating phenomena we did not 
immediately connect them with some 
principles, not only would it be impos- 
sible for us to combine these isolated 
. observations, and therefore to derive any 
I profit from them, but we should even be 
x . entirely incapable of remembering the 
) facts-, which would for the most part 
remain unnoted by us. 

15. Thus there were two difficulties to 
be overcome : the human mind had to 

• observe in order to form real theories, 
land yet had to form theories of some 
j sort before it could apply itself to a con- 
nected series of observations. The 
primitive human mind, therefore, found 
itself involved in a vicious circle, from 
which it would never have had any 
means of escaping, if a natural way out 
of the difficulty had no t fortunately been 
found byjhe_ spontaneous, development 
of Theological conceptions. These pre- 
sented a rallying-point for the efforts of 
the mind, and furnished materials for its 
activity. This is the fundamental motive 
which demonstrates the logical necessity 
for the purely Theological character of 
Primitive Philosophy, apart from those 
important social considerations relating 
to the matter which I cannot even 
indicate now. 

16. This necessity becomes still more 
evident, when we have regard to the 



perfect congruity of Theological Philo- 
sophy, with the peculiar nature of the 
researches on which the human mind, 
in its infancy, concentrated to so high a 
degree all its powers. It is, indeed, 
very noticeable how the most insoluble 
questions — such as the inner nature of 
objects, or the origin and purpose of all 
phenomena — are precisely those which 
the human mind proposes to itself, in 
preference to all others, in its primitive 
state ; all really soluble problems being 
looked upon as hardly worthy of serious 
thought. The reason for this is very 
obvious, since it is experience alone 
which has enabled us to estimate our 
abilities rightly, and if man had not 
commenced by over-estimating his forces, 
these would never have been able to 
acquire all the development of which 
they are capable. This fact is a necessity 
of our organisation. But, be that as it 
may, let us picture to ourselves as far as 
we can this early mental disposition, so 
universal and so prominent, and let us 
ask ourselves what kind of reception 
would have been accorded at such an 
epoch to the Posi tive P hilosophy, sup- 
posing it to have been then formed. 
The highest_ambition-of -this Philosophy 
is to discover the laws of phenomena, 
and its main characteristic is precisely 
that of regarding as "necessarily interdicted 
to the human re ason, all those sublime 
mysteri es whichTTheologi cal Philosophy, 
on the contrary, explains with such 
admirable facility, even to the smallest 
detail. Under such circumstances, it is 
easy to see what the choice of primitive 
man would be. 

17. The same thing is true, when we 
consider from a practical standpoint the 
nature of the pursuits which the human 
mind first occupies itself with. Under 
that aspect, they offer to man the strong 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 25 



attraction of an unlimited control over 
the exterior world, which is regarded as 
being entirely destined for our use, while 
all its phenomena seem to have close 
and continuous relations with our 
existence. These chimerical hopes, 
these exaggerated ideas of man's im- 
portance in the universe, to which the 
Theological Philosophy gives rise, are 
destroyed irrevocably by the first-fruits 
of the Positive Philosophy. But, at the 
commencement, they afforded an indis- 
pensable stimulus without the aid of 
which we cannot, indeed, conceive how 
the primitive human mind would have 
been induced to undertake any arduous 
labours. 

18. We are at the present time so far 
removed from that early state of mind — 
at least as regards the majority of pheno- 
mena — that it is difficult for us to 
appreciate properly the force and neces- 
sity of such considerations. Human 
reason is now so mature that we are 
able to undertake laborious scientific 
jresearches, without having in view any 
Vextraneous goal capable of strongly 
exciting the imagination, such as that 
which the astrologers or alchemists pro- 
posed to themselves. O ur inte llectual 
activity is sufficiently excite d by the mere 
hope f^jjfir™ 7 ^ 1 ™^ thp laws of pheno- 
mena, by the_.simple desire.,of verifying 
or disproving a theory. This, however, 
could hot be tne castTnn the infancy 
of the humarT~mind. Without the 
attractive chimeras of Astrology, or the 
powerful deceptions of Alchemy, for 
example, where should we have found 
the perseverance and ardour necessary 
for collecting the long series of observa- 
tions and experiments which, later on, 
served as a basis for the first Positive 
theories of these two classes of pheno- 
mena? 



19. The need of such a stimulus to 
our intellectual development was keenly 
felt long ago by Kepler in the case of 
astronomy, and has been justly appre- 
ciated in our own time by Berthollet in 
chemistry. 

20. The above considerations show us 
that, although the Positive Philosophy 
represents the true final state of human / 
intelligence — that to which it has always / 
tended more and more — it was none the 
less necessary to employ the Theological 
Philosophy at first and during many 
centuries, both as a m ethod and as 
furni§hinCTjro_yjsional_ doctrines. Since 
the Theological Philosophy is sponta- 
neous in its character, it is, for that 
reason, the only one possible in the 
beginning ; it is also the only one which 
can offer a sufficient interest to our 
budding intelligence. It is now very 
easy to see that, in order to pass from 
this provisional form of philosophy to 
the final stage, the human mind was 
naturally obliged to adopt Metaphysical 
methods and doctrines as a transitional 
form of philosophy. This last considera- 
tion is indispensable, in order to com- 
plete the general sketch of the great law 
which I have pointed out. 

21. It is easily seen that our under- 
standing, which was compelledTTo pro- 
gress by almost insensible steps, could 
not pass suddenly, and without any 
intermediate stages, from Theological to 
Positive philosophy. Theology and 
Physics are so profoundly incompatible, 
their* conceptions are so radically 
opposed in character, that, before giving 
up the one in order to employ the other 
exclusively, the human intelligence had 
to make use of intermediate conceptions,, 
which, being of a hybrid character, were 
eminently fitted to bring about a gradual 
transition. That is the part played by 



26 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



Metaphysical conceptions, and they have 
no other reaT~!ISe.\ By substituting, in 
the study ofphenomena, a correspond- 
ing inseparable entity for a direct super- 
natural agency — although, at first, the 
former was only held to be an offshoot 
of the latter — Man gradually accustomed 
himself t o Pon<;inVT _onT 
selves. 



the faoi-s them- 
In that way, the ideas of these 
metaphysical agents gradually became so 
dim that all right-minded persons only 
considered them to be the abstract 
names of the phenomena in question. 
It is impossible to imagine by what 
other method our understanding could 
have passed from frankly supernatural 
to purely natural considerations, or, in 
other words, from the Theological to the 
Positive regime. 

22. I have thus established, as far as 
it is possible to do so without entering 
into a special discussion, which would 
be out of place at the present moment, 
what I conceive to be the general Lawof 
Mental Develop ment. It will now be easy 
for us to determine precisely the exact 
nature of the Positive Philosophy. To do 
that is the special object of this chapter. 

23. We have seen that the funda- 
mental ^aiacJ£iLxiLJ±ia_En^iiiye Philo- 
sophy i s to consider all phenomena as 
subjec t to invariable natu ral Laws. The 
exact discovery of these Laws and their 
reduction to rh.^ lpacfl possible number 
constitut e the go al of all our efforts ; for 
we regard the search after what are called 
causes^ whether first or final, as absolutely 
inaccessible and unmeaning. It is 
unnecessary to dwell much on a prin- 
ciple which has now become so familiar to 
all who have made anything like a serious 
study of the observational sciences. 
Everybody, indeed, knows that in our 
positive explanations, even when they 
are most complete, we do not pretend to 



explain the real causes of phenomena, as 
this would merely throw the difficulty 
further back ; we only try to analyse 
correctly the circumstances of their 
production, and to connect them together 
by normal relations of succession and 
similarity. 

24. Thus, to cite the best example, 
we say that the general phenomena of 
the universe are explai?ied — as far as they 
can be — by the Newtonian Law of Gravita- 
tion. On the one hand, this admirable 
theory shows us all the immense variety of 
astronomical facts as only a single fact 
looked at from different points of view ; 
that fact being the constant tendency of 
all molecules towards each other, in 
direct proportion to their masses and 
inversely as the squares of their distances. 
On the other hand, this general fact is 
shown to be the simple extension of an 
extremely familiar and, therefore, well- 
known phenomenon — the weight of a 
body at the earth's surface. As to 
determining what attraction and weight 
are in themselves or what their causes 
are, these are questions which we regard 
as insoluble and outside the domain of 
the Positive Philosophy ; we, therefore, 
rightly abandon them to the imagination 
of the theologians or the subtleties of 
the metaphysicians. That it is clearly 
impossible to solve such questions is 
shown by the fact that, whenever an 
attempt has been made to give a rational 
explanation of the matter, the greatest 
thinkers have only been able to define 
one of these principles by the other. 
Attraction is defined as nothing else than 
universal weight, and weight is said to 
consist simply in terrestrial attraction. 
Explanations of this kind raise a smile, if 
put forward as furnishing us with a know- 
ledge of " things-in-themselves " and the 
mode of causation of phenomena. They 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 27 



are, however, the only satisfactory results 
obtainable, for they present as identical 
two orders of phenomena which were 
for so long a time regarded 'as uncon- 
nected. No sensible person would nowa- 
days seek to go beyond this. 

25. It would be easy to multiply these 
examples, which will occur very frequently 
throughout this treatise, for at the present 
day all great intellectual operations are 
conducted in this spirit. To take a 
single example of this from contemporary 
works, I will choose the fine series of 
researches made by Fourier on the Theory 
of Heat. This affords us an excellent 
verification of the preceding general 
remarks. In this work, the philosophical 
character of which is so eminently posi- 
tive, the most important and most 
precise laws of thermal phenomena are 
disclosed ; but the author has not once 
inquired into the intimate nature of Heat 
in itself, nor has he mentioned, except to 
point out its uselessness, the warm con- 
troversy between the partisans of Heat as 
a material substance and those who 
make it consist in the vibrations of an 
universal ether. And yet that work 
treats of the most important questions, 
several of which had never even been 
raised before; a clear proof that the 
human mind, by simply confining itself 
to researches of an entirely positive order, 
can find therein inexhaustible food for 
its highest form of activity, without attack- 
ing inaccessible problems. 

26. Having thus indicated, so far as 
it was possible to do so in this general 
sketch, the spirit of the Positive Philo- 
sophy, which the whole of this course 
is intended to develop, we must next 
consider what stage in the formation of 
that Philosophy has now been reached, 
and what remains to be done in order 
to constitute it fully. 



27. For this purpose, we must, in the 
first place, remember that the different 
branches of our knowledge were not able 
to pass at the same rate through ther 
three great phases of their development/ 
indicated above, and that consequently 
they did not arrive simultaneously sk 
the Positive state. There exists in this 
respect an invariable and necessary Order 
which our various classes of conceptions 
have followed, and were bound to follow, 
in their progressive course; and the 
exact consideration of this Order is the 
indispensable complement of the funda- 
mental mental law previously enunciated. 
That Order will form the special subject 
of the next chapter. At present it is 
sufficient to know that it co nforms to the 
diverse nature of the phenomena, and that 
it is determined by their degree of gener- 
ality, of simplicity, and of reciprocal in- 
dependence — three considerations which, 
although quite distinct, lead up to the 
same result. Thus, Astronomical pheno- 
mena, being the most general, the simplest, 
and the most independent of all others, 
were the first to be subjected to positive 
theories ; then followed in succession 
and for the same reasons the phenomena 
of Terrestrial Physics, properly so called, 
those of Chemistry, and finally Physio- 
logical phenomena. 

28. It is impossible to fix the precise 
date of this mental revolution ; we can 
only say that, like all other great human 
events, it took place continuously and at 
an increasing rate, especially since the 
labours of Aristotle and the Alexandrian 
school, and afterwards from the introduc- 
tion of natural science into the West of 
Europe by the Arabs. However, as it 
is better to fix an epoch in order to give 
greater precision to our ideas, I would 
select that of the great movement impar- 
ted to the human intellect two centuries 



28 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



ago, by the combined influence of the 
precepts of Bacon, the conceptions of 
Descartes, and the discoveries of Galileo. 
It was then that the spirit of the Positive 
Philosophy began to assert itself in the 
world, in evident opposition to the Theo- 
logical and Metaphysical spirit; for it 
was then that Positive conceptions dis- 
engaged themselves clearly from the 
superstitious and scholastic alloy, which 
had more or less disguised the true 
character of all the previous scientific 
work. 

29. Since that memorable epoch, the 
increasing influence of the Positive 
Philosophy and the decadent movement 
of Theological and Metaphysical Philo- 
sophy have been extremely marked. 
These movements have at last become so 
pronounced that, at the present day, it is 
\ impossible for any observer acquainted 
\ with the spirit of his age, to fail to recog- 
Inise the final bent of the human mind 
towards Positive studies, and the irrevoc- 
able break henceforth from those fruit- 
less doctrines and provisional methods 
which were only suited to its first flight. 
This fundamental mental revolution will 
therefore necessarily be carried out to 
the fullest extent. If, then, there still 
remains some great conquest to be made, 
some important division of the intellectual 
domain to be invaded, we can be certain 
that the transformation will take place 
there also, as it has been carried out in 
all the other branches of science. It 
would evidently be absurd to suppose 
that the human mind, which is so dis- 
posed to unity of method, would yet 
preserve indefinitely, in the case of a 
single class of phenomena, its primitive 
mode of philosophising, when it has 
once adopted for the other classes a new 
philosophic path of an, entirely opposite 
character. 



30. The whole thing reduces itself, 
therefore, to a simple question of fact : 
Does the Positive Philosophy, which, 
during the last two centuries, has gradu- 
ally acquired so great an extension,, 
embrace at the present day all classes of 
phenomena ? It is evident that it does 
not; and there still remains, therefore, a 
great scientific work to be executed, in 
order to give the Positive Philosophy that 
universal character indispensable for its 
final constitution. 

31. In the four principal categories of 
natural phenomena enumerated above, 
astronomical, physical, ch emical, and 
physiological, Tve notice an important 
omission" relating to social phenomena. 
Although these are implicitly comprised 
among physiological phenomena, yet, 
owing to their importance and the 
inherent difficulties of their study, they 
deserve to form a distinct class. This 
last order of ideas is concerned with the 
most special, most complicated, and 
most dependent of all phenomena; it 
has, therefore, necessarily progressed 
more slowly than all the preceding 
orders, even if we do not take into 
account the more special obstacles to 
its study which we shall consider later 
on. However that may be, it is evident 
that it has not yet been included within 
the domain of Positive philosophy. 
Theolog ical and metap hysical methods 
are never us ed now bv anyone in dealing 
with a ll the o ther ki nds o f phenomena, 
either as' a means of investigation or 
even as a mode of reasoning. But 
these discarded methods are, on the 
contrary, still ex clusively used for both 
purposes in everything whi ch con cerns 
so cial phenomenal , although their msuffi- 
ciency in this respect has been already 
fully felt by all good judges, such men 
being tired of these empty and endless 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 29 



discussions about divine right and the 
sovereignty of the people. 

32. Here, then, is the great, but evi- 
dently the only, gap which has to be 

filled up in order to finish the construc- 
tion of the Positive philosophy. Now 
that the human mind has founded 
celestial physics, terrestrial physics 
(mechani cal and chemical), an d organic 
physics (vegetable and a nimal), it only 
remains to com plete th e system of 
observational sciences by the foundation 
of Soc ial Phy sics. This is at the present 
time, under several important aspects, 
the greatest and most pressing of our 
mental needs, and to meet this need is, 
I make bold to say, the first purpose of 
this work, its special object. 

33. The conceptions which I shall 
endeavour to present relating to the 
study of social phenomena, and of which 
I hope that the present chapter will 
already enable us to see the germ, 
cannot be expected to raise Social 
Physics at once to the degree of per- 
fection which has been reached by the 
earlier branches of natural philosophy. 
Such a hope would be evidently 
chimerical, seeing that these branches 
still differ widely from one another in 
perfectness, as was, indeed, inevitable. 
But I aim at impressing upon this last 
branch of our knowledge the sa me Posi- 
tive char acter whjr.h. already marks all 
the other branches. If this condition is 
once really fulfilled, the philosop hical 
system of the modern world w ill be at 
last fo unded in its ent irety ; forthere is 
no observable fact which would not then 
be included in one or other of the five 
great categories of astronomical, physical, 
chemical, physiological, and social phe- 
nomena. All our fundamental concep- 
tions having thus been rendered homo- 
geneous, philosophy will be finally con- 



stituted in the Positive state. Its character 
will be henceforth unchangeable, and it 
will then only have to develop itself 
indefinitely, by incorporating the con- 
stantly-increasing knowledge which 
inevitably results from new observations 
or more profound meditations. Having 
by this means acquired the character of 
universality which as yet it lacks, the 
Positive Philosophy, with all its natural 
superiority, will be able to displace 
entirely the Theological and Metaphysical 
philosophies. The only real property 
possessed by Theology and Metaphysics 
at the present day is their character of 
universality, and when deprived of this 
motive for preference they will have for 
our successors only an historical interest. 

34. The first and special object of this 
course having been thus set forth, it is 
easy to comprehend its second and 
general aim, that which constitutes it a 
course of Positive Philosophy, and not 
merely a course on Social Physics. 

35. The formation of Social Physics 
at last completes the system of natural 
sciences. It, therefore, becomes possible 
and even necessary to summarise these 
different sciences, so that they may be 
co-ordinated by presenting them as so 
many branches of a single trunk, instead 
of continuing to look upon them as only 
so many isolated groups. Therefore, 
before proceeding to the study of social 
phenomena, I shall successively con- 
sider, in the encyclopaedic order given 
above, the different positive sciences 
already formed. 

36. It is, I think, unnecessary to warn 
the reader that I do not claim to give 
here a series of special courses of lectures 
on each of the principal branches of 
Natural Philosophy. Not to speak of the 
enormous time that such an enterprise 
would take it is clear that I cannot 



30 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



claim to be equipped for it, nor, I think 
I may add, can anyone else in the 
present state of human education. On 
the contrary, a course of the kind con- 
templated here requires, if it is to be 
properly understood, a previous series of 
special studies on the different sciences 
which will be treated therein. In the 
absence of this condition, it is very diffi- 
cult to realise, and impossible to properly 
estimate, the philosophical reflections 
which will be made upon these sciences. 
In one word, it is a course on Positive 
Philosophy, and not on the Positive 
Sciences, that I propose to give. We 
shall only have to consider here each 
fundamental science in its relations with 
the whole positive system, and as to the 
spirit characterising it ; that is to say, 
under the two-fold aspect of its essential 
methods and its principal doctrines. As 
to the doctrines, indeed, I shall often do 
no more than mention them as known 
to specialists, though I shall try to esti- 
mate their importance. 

37. In order to sum up the ideas 
relating to the two-fold purpose of this 
course, I must call attention to the two 
objects — the one special, the other 
general — which I have in view, and 
which, although distinct in themselves, 
are necessarily inseparable. On the one 
hand, it would be impossible to conceive 
of a course of Positive Philosophy unless 
Social Physics had first been founded, 
since an essential element would then be 
lacking ; consequently, the conceptions 
of such a course would not have that 
character of generality which ought to be 
their principal attribute^ and which dis- 
tinguishes our present study from any 
series of special studies. On the other 
hand, how can we proceed with sure step 
to the positive study of social pheno- 
mena, if the mind has not been first pre- 



pared by the thorough consideration of 
positive methods in the case of less com- 
plex phenomen a, and lurnished in addi- 
tion with a knowledge of the principal 
laws of earlier phenomena, all of which 
have a more or less direct influence upon 
social facts ? 

38. Although all the fundamental 
sciences do not inspire ordinary minds 
with an equal interest, there is not one 
of them which should be neglected in such 
a study as we are about to undertake. 
As regards the welfare of the human 
race, all of them are certainly of equal 
importance, when we examine them 
thoroughly. Besides, those whose results 
seem at first sight to offer only a minor 
practical interest are yet of the greatest t 
importance, either owing to the greater \ 
perfection of their methods, or as being 
the indispensable foundation of all the 
others. This is a consideration to which 
I shall have special occasion to refer in 
the next chapter. 

39. To guard, as far as possible, against 
the misconceptions likely to arise res- 
pecting a work so novel as this, I must 
add a few remarks to the explanations 
already given. I refer especially J:o that 
universal predominance of specialism \ 
which hasty readers might think was the J 
tendency of this course, and which is so } 
rightly looked upon as wholly contrary 
to the true spirit of the Positive Philo- 
sophy. These remarks will, moreover, 
have the more important advantage of 
exhibiting this spirit under a new aspect, 
calculated to make its general idea 
clearer. 

40. In the primitive state of our kno w- 
ledge, no reguTaF division exists among 
intellectual labours ; all the sciences are 
cultivated simultaneously b y tne ""same 
minds. 



ot organising 
human studies is at first inevitable and 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 31 



even indispensable, as I shall have occa- 
siori to showlater on^» but it gradually 
changes in proportion as the different 
orders of conceptions develop themselves. 
By a law whose necessity is evident, each 
branch of the scientific system gradually 
separates from the trunk when it has 
developed far enough to admit of separate 
cultivation — that is to say, when it has 
arrived at a stage in which it is capable 
of constituting the sole pursuit of certain 
minds. It is to t his division of the 
various k inds of research among d ifferent 
orders of scientists that we ev idently owe 
the de velopment which e ach distinct 
class of human knowledg e has attained 
in our time; but this very division renders 
it impossi ble for modern scien tists to 
practis e that simultaneous cultiv ation of 
all th e sciences which was so easy and so 
com mon in antiq uity. In a word, the 
division of intellectual labour,j:arried out 



further and further, 



of the most 



importa nt and char acteristic attributes of 
the Posi tive Philo sophy. 

41. But, while recognising the pro- 
digious results due to this division, and 
while seeing that it henceforth constitutes 
the true fundamental basis of the general 
organisation of the scientific world, it is, 
on the other hand, impossible not to be 
struck by the great inconveniences 
which it at present produces, on account 
of the excessive specialisation of the 
ideas which exclusively occupy each 
mind. This unfortunate result is no 
doubt inevitable up to a certain point, 
as being inherent in the very principle 
of the division of labour. Do what we 
will, therefore, we shall never be able to 
equal the ancients in this respect, for 
their general superiority was due to the 
slight degree of development of their 
knowledge. Yet, I think we can, by 
proper means, avoid the most pernicious 



effects of an exaggerated specialism, with- 
out doing injury to the fruitful influence 
of the division of labour in research. 
There is an urgent need for considering 
this question seriously, for these incon- 
veniences, which, by their very nature, 
tend constantly to increase, are now 
becoming very apparent. Everyone 
agrees that the divisions which we estab- 
lish between the various branches of 
Natural Philosophy, in order to make our 
labours more perfect, are at bottom 
artificial. In spite of this admission, we 
must not forget that the number of 
scientists who study the whole even of 
a single science is already very small, 
although such a science is, in its turn, 
only a part of a greater whole. The 
majority of scientists already confine 
themselves entirely to the isolated con- 
sideration of a more or less extensive 
section of a particular science, without 
concerning themselves much about the 
relation between their special work and 
the general system of positive knowledge. 
Let us hasten to remedy this evil before 
it becomes more serious. Let us take 
care that the human mind aoes not 
finish by losin g its way jn^a^mass of 
detail We must not conceal from our- 
selves that this is the essentially weak 
side of our system, and that this is the 
point on which the partisans of Theo- 
logical and Metaphysical philosophy may 
still attack the Positive Philosophy with 
some hope of success. 

42. The true means of arresting the 
pernicious influence which seems to 
threaten the intellectual future of our 
race, on account of a too great speciali- 
sation of individual researches, is clearly 
not to return to the ancient confusion of 
labours. This would tend to put the 
human mind back ; and, besides, such a 
return has happily become impossible 



32 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



now. The true remedy consists, on the 
contrary, in perfecting the division of 
labour itself. All that is necessary 
is to create one more great speciality, 
consisting in the study of scientific 
generalisations. We need a new class of 
properly-trained scientists, who, instead 
of devoting themselves to the special 
study of any particular branch of Natural 
Philosophy, shall employ themselves 
solely in the consideration of the different 
Positive Sciences in their present state. 
It would be their function to determine 
exactly the character of each science, to 
discover the relations and concatenation 
of the sciences, and to reduce, if possible, 
all their chief principles to the smallest 
number of common principles, while 
always conforming to the fundamental 
maxims of the Positive Method. At 
the same time, the other scientists, before 
devoting themselves to their respective 
specialities, should have received a pre- 
vious training embracing all the general 
principles of positive knowledge. This 
would enable them henceforth to make 
immediate use of the light thrown on 
their work by the scientists devoted to 
the study of generalities, whose results 
the specialists would, in turn, be able to 
rectify. That is a state of things to 
which the existing scientists are drawing 
nearer every day. If these two great 
conditions were once fulfilled, as they 
evidently can be, then the division of 
labour in the sciences could be carried on, 
without any danger, as far as the develop- 
ment of the different kinds of knowledge 
required. There would be a distinct 
class of men (always open to the 
criticism of all the other classes), whose 
special and permanent function would 
consist in connecting each new special 
discovery with the general system ; and 
we should then have no cause to fear 



that too great an attention bestowed upon 
the details would ever prevent us from 
perceiving the whole. In a word, the 
modern organisation of the scientific 
world would then be accomplished, and 
would be susceptible of indefinite develop- 
ment, while always preserving the same 
character. 

43. To make the study of scientific 
generalisations a distinct department of 
intellectual labour is merely a further 
extension of the same principle of divi- 
sion which led to the successive separa- 
tion of the different sciences. As long 
as the different Positive Sciences were 
only slightly developed, their mutual 
relations were not important enough to 
give rise, at all events permanently, to a 
special class of workers ; nor was the 
need of this new study nearly so urgent 
as it is now. But, at the present day, 
each of the sciences has developed on 
its own lines to such an extent that the 
examination of their mutual relations 
affords material for systematic and con- 
tinued labour, while at the same time 
this new order of studies becomes indis- 
pensable, to prevent the dispersion of 
human ideas. 

44. Such, in my view, is the office of 
the Positive Philosophy in relation to 
the Positive Sciences properly so called. 
Such, at all events, is the aim of the 
present work. 

45. I have now determined, as exactly 
as it was possible for me to do in a first 
sketch, the general spirit of a course of 
Positive Philosophy. In order to bring 
out its full character, I must state con- 
cisely the principal general advantages 
which such a work may have — if its 
essential conditions are properly fulfilled 
— as regards intellectual progress. I will 
mention only four. They are fundamental 
qualities of the Positive Philosophy. 



S 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 33 



46. In the first place, the study of the 
Positive Philosophy, by considering the 
results of the activity of our intellectual 
faculties, furnishes us with the only 
really rational means of exhibiting the 
logical laws of the human mind, which 
have hitherto been sought by methods 
so ill calculated to reveal them. 

47. To explain what I mean on this 
point, I must first recall a philosophical 
conception of the highest importance, 
set forth by Blainville in the fine intro- 
duction to his Principles of Comparative 
Anatomy. According to him, every 
active being, and especially every living 
being, may be studied in all its manifes- 
tations under two fundamental relations 
— the Statical and the Dynamical ; that 
is, as fitted to act and as actually acting. 
It is clear that all the considerations 
which might be presented will necessarily 
fall under the one or the other of these 
he&ds. Let us apply this luminous 
fundamental maxim to the study of 
intellectual functions. 

48. If these functions are regarded 
from a Statical point of view, their study 
can only consist in determining the 
organic conditions on which they 
depend ; it thus forms an essential part 
of anatomy and physiology. When con- 
sidering the question from a Dynamical 
point of view, we have merely to study 
the actual march of the human intellect, 
in practice, by examining the procedures 
used by it in order to acquire a know- 
ledge of the various sciences ; this con- 
stitutes essentially the general object of 
the Positive Philosophy, as I have already 
defined it in this chapter. In brief, we 
must look upon all scientific theories as 
so many great logical facts ; and it is 
only by a thorough observation of these 
facts that we can rise to the knowledge 
of logical laws. 



49. These are evidently the only two 
general methods, complementary to each 
other, by the use of which we are able 
to arrive at any really rational ideas con- 
cerning intellectual phenomena. We 
see that in no case is there room for that 
illusory psychology — the last transforma- 
tion of theology — to revive which attempts 
are being made so vainly at the present 
day. This theory, while ignoring and 
discarding the physiological study of our 
intellectual organs, and the observation 
of the rational methods which actually 
direct our various scientific researches, 
claims that it can discover the funda- 
mental laws of the human mind, by con- 
templating it in itself, without paying any 
attention either to the causes or the 
effects of its activity. 

50. The preponderance of the Positive 
Philosophy has been steadily growing 
since Bacon's time. It has to-day 
acquired, indirectly, so great a hold over 
even those minds which are the least 
familiar with its immense development 
that the metaphysicians devoted to the 
study of the intellect could only hope to 
check the decadence of their pretended 
science, by presenting their doctrines as 
being also founded upon the observation 
of facts. In order to do this, they have 
recently attempted to distinguish, by a 
very singular subtlety, two kinds of obser- 
vation of equal importance, the one 
exterior, the other interior, the last being 
solely devoted to the study of intellectual 
phenomena. To enter into a special 
discussion of this fundamental sophism 
would be out of place here. I must be 
content with indicating the principal 
consideration which proves, clearly, that 
this pretended direct contemplation of 
the mind by itself is a pure illusion. 

51. It was thought, until quite recently, 
that vision was explained by saying that 

D 



34 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



the luminous action of bodies produces 
on the retina actual pictures, representing 
exterior forms and colours. To this the 
physiologists have reasonably objected 
that, if the luminous impressions pro- 
duced real paintings on the retina, we 
should need another eye to see them. 
Is not this reasoning still more applicable 
in the present instance ? 

M>2\ It is clear that, by an inevitable 
ne^c-essity, the human mind can observe 
all phenomena directly, except its own. 
For by whom would the observation be 
made ? As far as moral phenomena are 
concerned, it may be granted that it is 
possible for a man to observe the passions 
which animate him, for the anatomical 
reason that the organs which are their 
seat are distinct from those whose 
functions are devoted to observation. 
Everyone has had occasion to notice 
this fact for himself, but such observa- 
tions would evidently never possess much 
scientific value. The best way of know- 
ing the passions will always be to observe 
them from the outside ; for a person in 
any state of extreme passion — that is to 
say, in precisely the state which it is 
most essential to examine — would neces- 
sarily be incapacitated for observing him- 
self. But in the case of intellectual pheno- 
mena, to observe them in this manner 
while they are taking place is clearly out 
of the question. The thinking indi- 
vidual cannot cut himself in two — one of 
the parts reasoning, while the other is 
looking on. Since in this case the organ 
observed and the observing organ are 
identical, how could any observation be 
made? 

53. The principle of this so-called psy- 
chological method is therefore quite 
worthless. Besides, consider to what 
thoroughly contradictory proceedings it 
immediately leads ! On the one hand, 



you are recommended to isolate yourself, 
as far as possible, from the outer world, 
and you must especially give up all intel- 
lectual work; for if you were only en- 
gaged in making the simplest calcula- 
tion, what would become of the interior 
observation ? On the other hand, after 
having, by means of due precautions, 
at last attained to this perfect state of 
intellectual slumber, you must then 
occupy yourself in contemplating the 
operations which will be taking place in 
a mind supposed to be blank ! Our 
descendants will no doubt see such pre- 
tensions ridiculed on the stage some 
day. 

54. The results of such a strange pro- 
cedure are in thorough accordance with 
the principle. For the last two thousand 
years the metaphysicians have in this 
manner been cultivating psychology, and 
yet they have not been able to agree on 
one single intelligible and sound propo- 
sition. They are, even at the present 
day, divided into a multitude of schools 
which are incessantly disputing on the 
first elements of their doctrines. In 
fact, interior observation gives rise to 
almost as many divergent opinions as 
there are so-called observers. 

55. The true scientists — the men de- 
voted to the positive sciences — are still 
calling in vain on these psychologists to 
cite a single real discovery, great or 
small, due to this much-vaunted method. 
It does not follow that all their labours 
have been absolutely fruitless as regards 
the general progress of our knowledge, 
and we must remember the valuable 
service which they rendered in sustaining 
the activity of human intelligence, at a 
time when it could find no more sub- 
stantial aliment. But their writings 
largely consist of what an illustrious 
positive philosopher, M. Cuvier, has well 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 35 



called " metaphors mistaken for reason- 
ing." We may safely affirm that any true 
notions they present have been obtained, 
not by their pretended method, but by 
those actual observations on the progress 
of the human mind to which the develop- 
ment of the sciences has from time to 
time given birth. And even these ideas, 
so scanty in number, although proclaimed 
with so much emphasis, and only due to 
the unfaithfulness of the psychologists to 
their pretended method, are generally 
either greatly exaggerated or very incom- 
plete, and they are very inferior to the 
remarks which scientists have already 
unostentatiously made upon the methods 
which they employ. It would be easy 
to cite some striking examples of this, if 
I did not fear that I should be prolonging 
the discussion of the point too much : 
take, for instance, the treatment of the 
theory of algebraical signs by metaphy- 
sicians and geometers respectively. 

56. The considerations relating to 
logical science which I have just indicated 
become still more evident when we deal 
with the art of logic. 

57. For when we want not only to 
know what the Positive Method consists 
in, but also to have such a clear and 
deep knowledge of it as to be able to 
use it effectively, we must consider it in 
action ; we must study the various great 
applications of the method which the 
human mind has made and already 
verified. In a word, it is only by a philo- 
sophical examination of the sciences 
that we can attain the desired result. 
The method does not admit of being 
studied apart from the researches on 
which it is employed ; or, at all events, it 
is only a lifejess study, incapable of fer- 
tilising the mind which resorts to it. 
Looking at it in that abstract way, the 
only real information that you can give 



about it amounts to no more than a few 
general propositions, so vague that they 
can have no influence on mental habits. 
When we have thoroughly established, 
as a logical thesis, that all our knowledge 
must be founded upon observation, that 
we must proceed sometimes from facts 
to principles, at other times from prin- 
ciples to facts, and some other similar 
aphorisms, we still know the method far 
less clearly than he who has studied at 
all completely a single positive science, 
even without any philosophical purpose 
in view. It is because they have failed 
to recognise this essential fact that our 
psychologists have been led to take their 
reveries for science, in the belief that they 
understood the Positive Method because 
they have read the precepts of Bacon or 
the discourse of Descartes. 

58. I do not know if, in the future, it 
will become possible to construct by a 
priori reasoning a genuine course on 
Method, wholly independent of the philo- 
sophical study of the sciences ; but I am 
quite convinced that it cannot be done 
at present, for the great logical methods 
cannot yet be explained with sufficient 
precision apart from their applications. 
I venture to add, moreover, that, even if 
such an enterprise could be eventually 
carried out, which is conceivable, it would 
nevertheless only be through the study 
of regular applications of scientific 
methods that we could succeed in 
forming a good system of intellectual 
habits ; which is, however, the essential 
object to be gained by studying method. 
There is no need to insist further just 
now on a subject which will fre- 
quently recur throughout this work, 
and in regard to which I shall present 
some new considerations in the next 
chapter. 

59. The first great direct result of the 



36 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



Positive Philosophy is, then, the mani- 
festation by e xperience of the laws w hich 
our intellectual functions follo w in their 
operations; and, consequently, a precise 



knowl edge of the general rules which 
are su itable for our guidance I B the 
investigation of truth. 

60. A~secTmd consequence of no less 
importance and of much more urgent 
concern, which must immediately result 
from the establishment of the Positive 
Philosophy as defined in this chapter, is 
the recasting of our educational system. 

61. Competent judges are already 
unanimous in recognising the necessity 
of replacing our European education, 
which is still essentially theological, 
metaphysical, and literary, by a positive 
education in accordance with the spirit 
of our time and adapted to the needs of 
modern civilisation. Various attempts 
have been made in increasing number 
during the last hundred years, and espe- 
cially during recent years, to spread and 
augment, without ceasing, instruction of 
a positive kind. Such attempts, which 
the different European Governments 
have always eagerly encouraged and 
often initiated, are a sufficient testimony 
that the spontaneous feeling of this 
necessity is everywhere growing. But, 
while supporting these useful enterprises 
as much as possible, we must not conceal 
the fact that, in the present state of our 
ideas, they are not at all capable of attain- 
ing their principal object — namely, the 
fundamental regeneration of general 
education. The exclusive speciality, the 
too rigid isolation, which still charac- 
terises our way of conceiving and of 
cultivating the sciences has necessarily 
a marked influence upon the mode of 
teaching them. An intelligent person 
who wishes at the present day to study 
the principal branches of Natural Philo- 



sophy, in order to acquire a general 
system of positive ideas, is obliged to 
study each separate science in the same 
way, and with the same amount of detail, 
as if he wished to become an astro- 
nomical or chemical specialist, etc. 
This renders such an education almost 
impossible and necessarily very imperfect, 
even in the case of the most intelligent 
minds, placed in the most favourable 
circumstances. Such a mode of pro- 
ceeding would, therefore, be wholly 
chimerical as regards general education ; 
and yet an essential requirement of the 
latter is a complete body of positive 
conceptions on all the great classes of 
natural phenomena. It is such a general 
survey, on a more or less extended scale, 
which must henceforth constitute, even 
among the mass of the people, the 
permanent basis of all human combina- 
tions ; it must, in short, constitute the 
mental framework of our descendants. 
In order that Natural Philosophy may be 
able to complete the already partially 
accomplished regeneration of our intel- 
lectual system, it is, therefore, indispen- 
sable that the different sciences of which 
it is composed — regarding them as the 
different branches of a single trunk — 
should be first reduced to what consti- 
tutes their essence — that is, to their prin- 
cipal methods and most important 
results. It is only in this way that the 
teaching of the sciences can become the 
basis of a new general and really rational 
education for our people. Of course, 
each individual , after receiving this 
general education, will have to supple- 
ment it by such special education as he 
may require, in which he will study 
one or other of the special sciences. 
But the essential consideration which I 
wished to point out here is that all these 
special studies, even if by great labour 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 37 



all of them were mastered, would be 
necessarily insufficient to really renew 
our educational system, if they did not 
rest on the preliminary basis of this 
general education, itself the direct result 
of the Positive Philosophy as defined in 
this discourse. 

62. The special study of scientific 
generalities is not only destined to re- 
organise education, but it will also con- 
tribute to the particular progress of the 
different Positive Sciences. This con- 
stitutes the third fundamental property 
which I have to point out. 

63. The divisions which we establish 
between the sciences, although not 
arbitrary, as some people suppose, are yet 
essentially artificial. In reality, the sub- 
ject of all our researches is one; we 
only divide it so that we may, by separa- 
ting the difficulties, resolve them more 
easily. And so it occasionally happens 
that these established divisions are a 
hindrance, and that questions arise which 
need to be treated by combining the 
points of view of several sciences. This 
cannot be easily done when scientists 
are so addicted to specialism. Hence 
the problems are left unsolved for a much 
longer time than would otherwise be 
necessary. Such an inconvenience must 
make itself especially felt in the case of 
the more essential doctrines of each 
positive science. Very striking examples 
of this fact could be easily cited, and I 
shall carefully call attention to them as 
they occur in the course of this work. 

64. I could cite a very memorable 
example of this in the past, in the case 
of the admirable conception of Descartes 
relating to analytical geometry. This 
fundamental discovery, which has 
changed the aspect of mathematical 
science, and in which we should see the 
true germ of all the great subsequent 



progress, is simply the result of estab- 
lishing a closer connection between two 
sciences which had hitherto been 
regarded from separate standpoints. 
But the case will be still more decisive 
if we consider some questions which are 
still under discussion. 

65. I will take the case, in Chemistry, 
of the important doctrine of Definite 
Proportions. It is certain that the 
memorable discussion which has been 
raised in our own time, relating to the 
fundamental principle of this theory, 
cannot yet be considered, in spite of 
appearances, as irrevocably terminated. 
For this is not, in my opinion, a simple 
question of chemistry. I venture to 
assert that, in order to settle the point 
definitively — that is, to determine whether 
it is a law of nature that atoms neces- 
sarily combine together in fixed propor- 
tions — it will be indispensable to unite 
the chemical with the physiological point 
of view. This is shown by the fact that, 
even in the opinion of the illustrious 
chemists who have most powerfully con- 
tributed to the formation of this doctrine, 
the utmost that can be said is that it is 
always verified in the composition of 
inorganic bodies ; but it is no less con- 
stantly at fault in the case of organic 
compounds, to which up to the present 
it seems quite impossible to extend the 
doctrine. Now, before erecting the 
theory into a truly fundamental principle, 
ought not this immense exception to be 
first considered ? Does it not belong to 
the same general characteristic of all 
organic bodies, that in none of their 
phenomena can we make use of invari- 
able numbers ? However that may be, 
an entirely new order of considerations, 
belonging equally to chemistry and 
physiology, is evidently necessary in 
order to decide finally, in some way or 



38 NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



other, this great question of natural 
philosophy. 

66. I think it will be well to consider 
here a second example of the same kind, 
which, since it relates to a subject of 
much more limited scope, shows even 
more conclusively the special importance 
of the Positive Philosophy in the solution 
of questions which need the combination 
of several sciences. This example, which 
I also take from Chemistry, is the still 
controverted question as to whether, in the 
present state of our knowledge, nitrogen 
should be regarded as an element or a 
compound. The illustrious Berzelius, 
differing from almost all living chemists, 
believes it to be a compound ; and the 
reasons, of a purely chemical nature, 
which he gives for his opinion are so 
weighty as to balance those of his 
opponents. But what I want particu- 
larly to point out is that Berzelius, as he 
admits himself — and a most instructive 
admission it is — was greatly influenced 
by the physiological observation that 
animals which feed on non-nitrogenous 
matter contain in their tissues just as 
much nitrogen as the carnivorous 
animals. It is therefore quite clear that, 
in order to decide whether nitrogen is or 
is not an element, we must necessarily 
call in the aid of physiology, and 

combine with chemical considerations 

i 

properly so-called, a series of new 
researches on the relation between the 
composition of living bodies and the 
nature of their food. 

67. It would be superfluous now to go 
on multiplying examples of these com- 
plex problems, which can only be solved 
by the intimate combination of several 
sciences which are at present cultivated 
in a wholly independent manner. Those 
which I have just cited are sufficient to 
show, in a general way, the importance of 



the function which the Positive Philo- 
sophy will perform in perfecting each of 
the natural sciences, since it is directly 
destined to organise in a permanent 
manner combinations of this kind, which 
could not be suitably formed without its 
aid. 

68. There is a fourth and last funda- 
mental property of what I have called 
the Positive Philosophy, to which I must 
thus early draw attention, and which no 
doubt deserves our notice more than 
any other property, since it is to-day the 
most important one from a practical 
point of view. We may look upon the 
Positive Philosophy as constituting the 
only solid basis of the social reorganisa- 
tion, which must terminate the crisis in 
which the most civilised nations have for 
so long found themselves. The last part 
of this course will be specially devoted 
to establish and develop this proposition. 
But the general sketch of my great sub- 
ject which I have undertaken to give in 
this chapter would lack one of its most 
characteristic elements if I failed to call 
attention here to such an essential con- 
sideration. 

69. It may be thought that I am 
making a too ambitious claim for the 
Positive Philosophy. But a few very 
simple reflections will suffice to justify it. 

70. There is no need to prove to 
readers of this work that the world is 
governed and overturned by ideas, or, 
in other words, that the whole social 
mechanism rests finally on opinions. 
They know, above all, that the great 
political and moral crisis of existing 
societies is due at bottom to intellectual 
anarchy. Our gravest evil consists, in- 
deed, in this profound divergence which 
now exists among all minds, with regard 
to all the fundamental maxims whose 
fixity is the first condition of a true 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 39 



social order. As long as individual 
minds are not unanimously agreed upon 
a certain number of general ideas capable 
of forming a common social doctrine, we 
cannot disguise the fact that the nations 
will necessarily remain in an essentially 
revolutionary state, in spite of all the 
political palliatives which may be 
adopted. Such a condition of things 
only really admits of provisional institu- 
tions. It is equally certain that, if this 
general agreement upon first principles 
can be once obtained, the appropriate 
institutions will necessarily follow, with- 
out giving rise to any grave shock ; for 
the greater part of the disorder will have 
been already dissipated by the mere fact 
of the agreement. All those, therefore, 
who feel the importance of a truly nor- 
mal state of things should direct their 
attention mainly to this point. 

71. And now, from the lofty stand- 
point to which the various considerations 
indicated in this chapter have step by 
step raised us, it is easy both to charac- 
terise clearly the present state of society 
as regards its inner spirit, and to deduce 
therefrom the means by which that state 
can be essentially changed. Returning 
to the fundamental law enunciated at 
the commencement of this chapter, I 
think we may sum up exactly all the 
observations relating to the existing 
situation of society, by the simple state- 
ment that the actual confusion of men's 
minds is at bottom due to the simul- 
taneous employment of three radically 
incompatible philosophies — the Theo- 
logical, Metaphysical, and Positive. It 
is quite clear that, if any one of these 
three philosophies really obtained a 
complete and universal preponderance, 
a fixed social order would result, whereas 
the existing evil consists above all in the 
absence of any true organisation. It is 



the existence of these three opposite 
philosophies which absolutely prevents 
all agreement on any essential point. 
Now, if this opinion be correct, all that 
is necessary is to know which of the 
three philosophies can and must prevail 
by the nature of things ; every sensible 
man should next endeavour to work for 
the triumph of that philosophy, whatever 
his particular opinions may have been 
before the question was analysed. The 
question being once reduced to these 
simple terms, the issue cannot long 
remain doubtful, because it is evident 
for all kinds of reasons, some of the 
principal of which have been indicated 
in this chapter, that the Positive Philo- 
sophy is alone destined to prevail in the' 
ordinary course of things. It alone has 
been for many centuries making con- 
stant progress, while its antagonists have 
been as constantly in a state of decay. 
Whether this is a good or a bad thing 
matters little ; the general fact cannot be 
denied, and that is sufficient. We may 
deplore the fact, but we are unable to 
destroy it ; nor, consequently, can we 
neglect it, on pain of giving ourselves 
up to illusory speculations. This general 
revolution of the human mind is, at the 
present time, almost entirely accom- 
plished. Nothing more remains to be 
done, as I have already explained, than 
to complete the Positive Philosophy by 
including in it the study of Social Pheno- 
mena, and then to sum them up in a 
single body of homogeneous doctrine. 
When these two tasks have made suffi- 
cient progress, the final triumph of the 
Positive Philosophy will take place spon- 
taneously, and will re-establish order in 
society. The marked preference which 
almost all minds, from the highest to the 
lowest, show, at the present day, for 
positive knowledge, as contrasted with 



4o NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 



vague and mystical conceptions, augurs 
well for the reception which awaits this 
Philosophy when it shall have acquired 
the only quality which it still lacks — a 
character of suitable generality. 
/ 72. To sum the matter up : the Theo- 
logical and Metaphysical philosophies are 
now disputing with each other the task of 
reorganising society, although the task is 
really too hard for their united efforts ; 
it is between these schools only that any 
struggle still exists in this respect. The 
Positive Philosophy has, up to the present, 
only intervened in the contest in order to 
criticise both schools; and it has accom- 
plished this task so well as to entirely dis- 
credit them. Let us now put it in a condi- 
tion to play an active part, without paying 
any further attention to debates which 
have become useless. We must complete 
the vast intellectual operation commenced 
by Bacon, Descartes, and Galileo, by 
furnishing the Positive Philosophy with 
the system of general ideas which is 
destined to prevail henceforth, and for an 
indefinite future, among the human race. 
The revolutionary crisis which harasses 
civilised peoples will then be at an end. 

73. Such are the four principal advan- 
tages which will follow from the establish- 
ment of the Positive Philosophy. I have 
thought it well to mention them at once, 
because they supplement the general 
definition which I have tried to give of it. 

74. Before concluding, I desire to 
caution the reader briefly against an 
erroneous anticipation which he might 
form as to the nature of the present work. 

75. In saying that the aim of the 
Positive Philosophy was to sum up, in a 
single body of homogeneous doctrine, 
the aggregate of acquired knowledge 
relating to the different orders of natural 
phenomena, I did not mean that we 
should proceed to the general study of 



these phenomena, by looking upon them 
all as so many different effects of a single 
principle, as reducible to one sole law. 
Although I must treat this question 
specially in the next chapter, I think it 
necessary to say so much at once, in 
order to avoid unfounded objections 
which might otherwise be raised. I 
refer to those critics who might jump to 
the conclusion, that this course is one of 
those attempts at universal explanation 
by a single law, which one sees daily 
made by men who are entire strangers 
to scientific methods and knowledge. 
Nothing of that kind is intended here ; 
and the development of this course will 
furnish the best proof of it, to all those 
whom the explanations contained in this 
chapter might have left in any doubt on 
the subject. 

76. It is my deep personal conviction 
that these attempts at the universal 
explanation of all phenomena by a single 
law are highly chimerical, even when 
they are made by the most competent 
minds. I believe that the resources of 
the human mind are too feeble, and 
that the universe is too complicated, to 
admit of our ever attaining such scientific 
perfection ; and I also think that a very 
exaggerated idea is generally formed of 
the advantages to be derived from it, 
even were it attainable. In any case, it 
seems to me evident that, considering 
the present state of our knowledge, we 
are yet a long way off from the time 
when any such attempt might be reason- 
ably expected to succeed. It seems to 
me that we could only hope to arrive at 
it, by connecting all natural phenomena 
with the most general positive law we 
are acquainted with — the Law of Gravita- 
tion — which already links all astronomical 
phenomena to some of the phenomena 
of terrestrial physics. Laplace has 



NATURE AND IMPORTANCE OF THE POSITIVE PHILOSOPHY 41 



actually brought forward a conception 
by which chemical phenomena would be 
regarded as purely simple molecular 
effects of Newtonian attraction, modified 
by the figure and mutual position of the 
atoms. This conception would probably 
always remain an open question, owing 
to the absence of any essential data 
respecting the intimate constitution of 
bodies ; and it is almost certain that 
the difficulty of applying the idea would 
be so great that we should still be 
obliged to retain, as an artificial aid, the 
division which is at present regarded as 
natural betweenastronomyand chemistry. 
Accordingly, Laplace only presented this 
idea as a mere philosophical pastime, 
which was incapable of really exercising 
any useful influence on the progress of 
chemical science. The case is, however, 
really still stronger, for even if we sup- 
posed this insurmountable difficulty 
overcome, we should still not have 
attained scientific unity, since it would 
be necessary next to connect the same law 
of gravitation with the whole of physio- 
logy ; and this would certainly not be the 
least difficult part of the task. And, yet, the 
hypothesis which we have just been dis- 
cussing would be, on the whole, the most 
favourable to this much-desired unity. 

77. I have no need to go further into 
details in order to convince the reader 
that the object of this course is by no 
means to present all natural phenomena 
as being at bottom identical, apart from 
the variety of circumstances. The Posi- 
tive Philosophy would no doubt be more 
perfect if this were possible. But this 
condition is not at all necessary, either 
for its systematic formation or for the 
realisation of the great and happy conse- 
quences which we have seen that it is 
destined to produce. The only indis- 
pensable unity for those purposes is that 



of Method, which can and evidently 
must exist, and is already largely estab- 
lished. As to the Doctrine, it is not 
necessary that it should be unified ; it is 
sufficient if it be homogeneous. It is, 
therefore, from the double standpoint of 
unity of method and homogeneity of 
doctrines that the different classes of 
positive theories will be considered in the 
present work. While trying to diminish, 
as far as possible, the number of general 
laws necessary for the positive explana- 
tion of natural phenomena — which is the 
real philosophic purpose of all science — 
we shall think it rash ever to hope, even 
in the most distant future, to reduce 
these laws rigorously to a single one. 

78. I have attempted in this chapter 
to determine, as exactly as I could, the 
aim, the spirit, and the influence of the 
Positive Philosophy. I have, therefore, 
indicated the goal towards which my 
labours have always tended, and always 
will tend unceasingly, in this course or 
elsewhere. No one is more profoundly 
convinced than myself of the inadequacy 
of my intellectual powers, even if they 
were far superior to what they are, to 
undertake such a vast and noble work. 
But although the task is too great for a 
single mind or a single lifetime, yet one 
man can state the problem clearly, and 
that is all I am ambitious of doing. 

79. Having thus expounded the true 
aim of this course, by settling the point 
of view from which I shall consider the 
various principal branches of Natural 
Philosophy, I shall in the next chapter 
complete these general preliminaries by 
explaining the plan I have adopted — that 
is to say, by determining the encyclopaedic 
order which should be established among 
the several classes of natural phenomena, 
and consequently among the correspond- 
ing Positive Sciences. 



Part II. 

EXPLANATION OF THE PLAN OF THIS COURSE, 
OR GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS ON THE 
CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



i. The considerations to be presented in 
this course on all the principal branches 
of Natural Philosophy have been charac- 
terised as exactly as possible in the pre- 
ceding chapter. We must now determine 
the plan which we should follow, by find- 
ing what is the most suitable rational 
Classification of the different fundamental 
Positive Sciences, so that we may study 
them in succession from the standpoint 
which we have adopted. This second 
general discussion is indispensable, in 
order to make clear at the outset the 
true spirit of this course. 

2. We can easily see, in the first place, 
that there is no need to criticise here the 
numerous Classifications which have been 
successively proposed during the last two 
centuries as general systems of human 
knowledge, regarded in its entirety. We 
are at the present time thoroughly con- 
vinced that all the encyclopaedic scales — 
such as those of Bacon and D'Alembert 
— which are based upon any distinction 
between the different faculties of the 
human mind, are for that reason alone 
radically defective. That is true even 
when this distinction is not, as is often 
the case, more subtle than real ; for in 
each of its spheres of activity our under- 
standing makes simultaneous use of all 
its principal faculties. As to all the other 
Classifications which have been proposed, 



it is sufficient to observe that the definite 
result of the different discussions raised 
upon this subject has been to demon- 
strate in each of them some radical defect 
or other ; so that not one of them has 
been able to command universal assent, 
there being in this respect almost as 
many opinions as there are individuals 
holding them. These different attempts 
have, indeed, been as a rule so badly 
conceived that a prejudice has involun- 
tarily arisen in most intelligent minds 
against every undertaking of this kind. 

3. Without dwelling further on such a 
well-established fact, it is more essential 
to seek the cause of it. We can easily 
account for the profound imperfection 
of those attempts at classification which 
have been so often renewed up to the 
present time. I need hardly say that, 
owing to the general discredit into which 
works of this nature have fallen, due to 
the inadequacy of the earlier schemes, 
these Classifications are now seldom 
attempted, except by persons almost 
entirely ignorant of the sciences which 
they undertake to classify. But, putting 
this personal consideration on one side, 
there is a much more important one, 
drawn from the very nature of the subject, 
which shows clearly why it has not 
hitherto been possible to rise to an 
encyclopaedic conception of a really 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



43 



satisfactory character. It consists in the 
want of homogeneity which has always 
existed until recently between the differ- 
ent parts of the intellectual system, some 
having successively become Positive, 
while others remained Theological or 
Metaphysical. In such an incoherent 
condition of things, it was evidently 
impossible to establish any rational 
Classification. How could one succeed 
in arranging in a single system concep- 
tions so profoundly contradictory? It 
is a difficulty which necessarily proved a 
stumbling-block to all the classifiers, and 
none of them were able to perceive its 
nature distinctly. It was very evident, 
however, for anyone who had grasped 
the true state of the human mind, that 
such an enterprise was premature, and 
could not be successfully attempted until 
all our principal ideas had become 
Positive. 

4. The explanations given in the pre- 
ceding chapter showthat this fundamental 
condition can now be regarded as ful- 
filled ; it is therefore possible to form a 
truly rational and stable arrangement of 
a system whose parts have at last become 
homogeneous. 

5. On the other hand, the general 
Theory of Classification which the philo- 
sophical labours of botanists and zoolo- 
gists have established in modern times 
encourages us to hope for real success 
in such a task, since it offers us 
a sure guide in the true fundamental 
principle of the art of classifying, which 
had never been clearly conceived until 
then. This principle is a necessary con- 
sequence of the only direct application 
of the Positive Method to this question 
of Classification, which, like every other 
question, should be treated as a matter 
of observation, instead of being deter- 
mined by a priori considerations. The 



principle is this — the Classification must 
proceed from a direct study of the 
objects to be classified, and must be 
determined by the real affinities and 
natural connections which they present. 
In this way, the Classification will itself 
become the expression of the most 
general fact which is manifested by a 
profound comparison of the objects 
embraced by it. 

6. Applying this fundamental rule to 
the present case, it follows that the 
mutual dependence which actually exists 
between the different Positive Sciences 
must determine our Classification of 
them ; and this dependence, if it is to 
be real, can only result from that of the 
corresponding phenomena. 

7. But, before proceeding in this 
observational spirit to the important 
work of Classification, it is indispensable, 
if we are not to lose our way in a work 
of too great compass, that we should 
circumscribe more precisely than we have 
yet done the subject that we propose to 
classify. 

8. All human works deal either with 
Speculation or Action, and the most 
general division, therefore, of our know- 
ledge is into Theoretical and Practical. 
If, in the first place, we consider this 
primary division, it is clear that we need 
only concern ourselves with Theoretical 
knowledge in a course of this kind. It 
is not a question of dealing with the 
entire system of human ideas, but only 
with those fundamental conceptions of 
the different orders of phenomena, which 
furnish a solid basis to all our other 
mental combinations of whatever kind, 
while being themselves independent of 
any antecedent intellectual system. 
Now, in such a study, it is theory which 
we have to consider, and not the appli- 
cation of it — except in so far as the 



44 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



application may elucidate the theory. 
This is probably what Bacon understood, 
although very imperfectly, by that First 
Philosophy which he said should be 
extracted from the whole of the sciences, 
and which has been so differently, and 
always so strangely, conceived by the 
metaphysicians who have undertaken to 
explain his idea. 

9. No doubt, when we embrace in our 
view human labour as a whole, whether 
Theoretical or Practical, we must regard 
our study of nature as intended to 
furnish us with the true rational basis 
for acting upon Nature. For it is only 
by knowing the laws of phenomena, and 
so foreseeing their occurrence, that we are 
able in active life to make these pheno- 
mena modify one another for our advan- 
tage. Our direct natural power of acting 
upon our environment is extremely 
feeble, and wholly disproportioned to 
our needs. Whenever we succeed in 
accomplishing anything great, it is due 
to the fact that our knowledge of natural 
laws allows us to introduce, among the 
fixed conditions under whose influence 
the different phenomena take place, 
some modifying elements. These, how- 
ever feeble they may be in themselves, 
are in certain cases sufficient to turn to 
our advantage the final results of the 
sum-total of external causes. We may 
sum up very exactly the general relation 
of Science to Art, using these two words 
in their widest sense, by the following 
very simple formula : from Science comes 
Prevision; from Prevision comes Action. 
10. But in spite of the vital impor- 
tance of this relation, which must never 
be ignored, we should form a very imper- 
fect idea of the Sciences if we were to 
regard them only as the bases of the Arts, 
an error to which our Age is, unhappily, 
too much inclined. Immense as are the 



services rendered to Industry by Science, 
and although according to the striking 
aphorism of Bacon — Knowledge is 
Power — we must never forget that the 
sciences have a yet higher and more 
direct destination, that of satisfying the 
craving of our minds to know the laws of 
phenomena. To feel how deep and 
urgent this craving is, it is sufficient to 
reflect for a moment upon the physio- 
logical effects of astonishment, and to 
recollect that the most terrible sensation 
which we can experience is that which 
occurs, whenever any phenomenon 
appears to take place in violation of the 
natural laws which are familiar to us. 
This need of arranging facts in an easily 
comprehended order — which is the 
proper object of all scientific theories — 
is so inherent in our organisation that, if 
we could not succeed in satisfying it by 
Positive conceptions, we should have to 
return inevitably to thoseTheological and 
Metaphysical explanations which, as I 
explained in the last chapter, had their 
origin in this need. 

n. I have thought it well to point 
out expressly at this stage a consideration 
which will frequently recur in the course 
of this work, in order to indicate the 
necessity of guarding against the undue 
influence of the habits of the present 
day, which tend to prevent the formation 
of just and noble ideas on the importance 
and destination of the Sciences. The 
general tendency of our time is, in this 
respect, defective and narrow. But, in 
the case of scientists, it is corrected, con- 
sciously or not, by the strong natural 
craving of which I have spoken. Other- 
wise the human intellect would be con- 
fined to researches of immediate practical 
utility, and, as Condorcet very justly 
remarked, would for that reason alone be 
completely arrested in its progress. This 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



45 



would be the case even as regards those 
practical applications to which we should 
have imprudently sacrificed the purely 
theoretical labours ; for the most impor- 
tant practical applications are constantly 
derived from theories formed for purely 
scientific purposes, and which have often 
been cultivated during many centuries 
without producing any practical result. 
A very remarkable example of this can 
be cited in the beautiful speculations of 
the Greek geometers on Conic Sections. 
These, after a long series of generations, 
effected the renovation of astronomy, 
and so finally enabled the art of naviga- 
tion to reach that degree of perfection to 
which it has in modern times attained, 
and which would never have been 
reached without the aid of such purely 
theoretical labours as those of Archimedes 
and Apollonius. As Condorcet truly 
said : " The sailor who is preserved from 
shipwreck by an exact observation of the 
longitude owes his life to a theory con- 
ceived two thousand years before, by 
some men of genius who had in view 
simply geometrical speculations." 

12. It is, therefore, evident that, after 
the study of Nature has been conceived 
in a general way as serving for the 
rational basis of our action upon it, we 
must next proceed to theoretical 
researches, leaving wholly on one side 
every practical consideration. Our 
means for discovering truth are so feeble 
that if we do not concentrate them 
exclusively upon this object, and if we 
hamper our search for truth with the 
extraneous condition that it shall have 
some immediate practical utility, it would 
be almost always impossible for us to 
succeed. 

13. However that may be, it is certain 
that the aggregate of our knowledge 
about Nature, and the aggregate of prac- 



tical procedures which we deduce from 
that knowledge in order to modify the 
natural order for our advantage, form 
two essentially distinct systems, which it 
is convenient to conceive of and to 
cultivate separately. Besides, the first 
system being the base of the second, it 
is clearly the one which should be con- 
sidered first in a methodical course of 
study, even if it were proposed to embrace 
therein the whole of Human Knowledge, 
both Theoretical and Practical. It 
appears to me that this Theoretical system 
should be the only subject dealt with at 
the present day in a truly rational course 
of Positive Philosophy ; at least, that is 
the way in which I regard the matter. 
No doubt it would be possible to imagine 
a more extended course, dealing with the 
generalities of both Theory and Practice. 
But I do not think that such an enter- 
prise, even apart from its vast extent, 
could be suitably attempted in the 
present condition of the human mind. 
It seems to me, indeed, to demand 
previous work of a very important and 
wholly special nature, which has not yet 
been accomplished — that of constructing, 
in accordance with scientific theories 
proper, the special conceptions intended 
to serve as direct bases for the general 
operations of Practice. 

14. In the present condition of mental 
development, the Sciences are not directly 
applicable to the Arts, at least in the 
most perfect cases. Between these two 
orders of ideas there lies a third, which, 
although still ill-determined in its philo- 
sophical character, is yet very apparent 
when we consider the class of persons 
who are specially occupied with it. 
Between the scientists proper and the 
actual directors of industry an inter- 
mediate class is rising up — that of the 
engineers, whose particular function is to 



4 6 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



settle the relations between Theory and 
Practice. "\ Unconcerned with the pro- 
gress of scientific knowledge, they study 
it in its present state for the purpose of 
deducing from it the industrial applica- 
tions which it can furnish. Such, at 
least, is the natural tendency of things, 
although there is still much confusion in 
this respect. The body of knowledge 
which should form the equipment of 
the engineering class, and which should 
establish the true direct theories of the 
different Arts, might no doubt give rise 
to philosophical considerations of great 
interest and real importance. But a 
work which should embrace them 
together with the theories founded on 
the pure Sciences would at present be 
altogether premature ; because these 
doctrines, intermediate between pure 
theory and direct practice, are not yet 
formed. Such imperfect elements of 
them as at present exist relate to the 
more advanced Sciences and Arts, 
and these merely allow us to conceive 
the nature and possibility of similar 
labours dealing with the whole body of 
human operations. It is thus — to cite 
the most important example — that we 
must regard the fine conception of 
Monge, relating to Descriptive Geometry, 
which is really nothing else than a general 
theory of the arts of construction. Very 
few similar ideas have as yet been formed 
in other departments ; I shall take care 
to notice them at their proper places in 
this course, and to point out their im- 
portance. But it is clear that concep- 
tions which, up to the present, are so 
incomplete, should not enter as an 
essential part into a course of Positive 
Philosophy, which should, as far as 
possible, be confined to such doctrines 
as have a fixed and clearly determined 
character. 



15. How difficult it is to construct 
these intermediate doctrines will be the 
better realised if we consider that every 
Art depends not only upon a certain 
corresponding Science, but upon several 
sciences simultaneously, so that the most 
important Arts borrow direct help from 
almost all the different principal Sciences. 
For example, the true theory of Agricul- 
ture — to confine myself to the principal 
case — demands an intimate combination 
of physiological, chemical, physical, and 
even astronomical and mathematical 
knowledge. The same thing is true in 
the case of the fine arts. Bearing this 
fact in mind, we easily perceive why 
these theories could not yet have been 
formed, since they assume the previous 
development of all the different funda- 
mental Sciences. Here, then, is another 
reason for not including such an order 
of ideas in a course of Positive Philo- 
sophy, since, far from being able to con- 
tribute to the systematic formation of 
this Philosophy, the general theories 
peculiar to the different principal Arts 
must, on the contrary, be a future con- 
sequence, and one of the most useful 
consequences, of its construction. 

16. In this course, then, we must con- 
sider only scientific theories, and not 
their practical applications. But a further 
distinction has still to be drawn with 
respect to the theories themselves. 
When this has been done, the field of 
our inquiry will at last be duly limited, 
and we shall be able to proceed to a 
methodical Classification of the Sciences 
with which Positive Philosophy is con- 
cerned. 

17. We must distinguish, with refer- 
ence to all kinds of phenomena, two 
classes of natural science. The first con- 
sists of the Abstract or General Sciences, 
whose object is the discovery of the laws 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



47 



regulating the different classes of pheno- 
mena in all conceivable cases. The 
other group comprises the Concrete, 
Special, or Descriptive Sciences, some- 
times called the Natural Sciences proper, 
whose function consists in applying 
these laws to the actual history of the 
different existing beings. The Abstract 
Sciences are, therefore, fundamental 
ones, and our studies in this course are 
concerned with them alone ; the others, 
whatever may be their intrinsic impor- 
tance, are really only secondary sciences, 
and, consequently, should not form part 
of a work whose great natural extent 
compels us to reduce it to the least pos- 
sible development. 

1 8. The distinction just drawn cannot 
present any difficulty to those who are 
at all familiar with the different Positive 
Sciences, since it is almost equivalent 
to the distinction which is usually made 
in nearly all scientific works between 
Dogmatic Physics and Natural History 
properly so-called. The importance of 
this division of the sciences into two 
groups is not yet sufficiently appreciated, 
and some examples will serve to render 
its nature more evident. 

19. The distinction may, in the first 
place, be perceived very clearly by com- 
paring, on the one hand, general Physio- 
logy, and, on the other, Zoology and 
Botany. Studying the laws of life in 
general, and determining the mode of 
existence of each living being as an 
individual, are evidently two works of 
very different character. The second 
study is besides necessarily founded on 
the first. 

20. The same thing is true in the 
case of Chemistry as contrasted with 
Mineralogy ; the first science is evidently 
the rational basis of the second one. 
In Chemistry we consider every possible 



molecular combination in every imagin- 
able circumstance; in Mineralogy we 
consider only those combinations which 
are actually found to occur as constituents 
of the Earth, and as subject to terrestrial 
influences alone. The difference between 
the chemical and mineralogical stand- 
point, although both sciences deal with 
the same objects, is clearly shown by the 
circumstance that the majority of the 
facts considered in chemistry have only 
an artificial existence; so that a body 
such as chlorine or potassium may 
possess great chemical importance owing 
to the extent and energy of its affinities, 
while its mineralogical interest may be 
almost nil. On the other hand, although 
a mineralogist would have a great deal 
to say about a compound such as granite 
or quartz, such a substance would be of 
little interest from a chemical stand- 
point. 

21. What makes still more evident 
the logical necessity of this fundamental 
distinction between the two great sections 
of Natural Philosophy is the fact that 
not only does each section of Concrete 
Physics presuppose the previous study 
of the corresponding section of Abstract 
Physics, but that it also demands a 
knowledge of the general laws relative 
to all orders of phenomena. Thus, for 
example, the special study of the earth 
considered under every possible aspect 
not only demands a previous acquaint- 
ance with physics and chemistry, but it 
cannot be properly accomplished without 
introducing, on the one hand, astro- 
nomical, and, on the other hand, physio- 
logical, knowledge ; so that Geology is 
related to the entire system of funda- 
mental sciences. The same thing is 
true of each of the other Concrete 
Sciences. It is precisely for this reason 
that Concrete Physics has up to the 



48 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



present made so little real progress, be- 
cause its study could not be begun in a 
truly rational manner until all the different 
principal branches of Abstract Physics 
had acquired a definite character, which 
did not occur until our own time. Until 
that had taken place, it was only possible 
to collect upon this subject some more 
or less unco-ordinated materials, which 
are still very incomplete. The known 
facts cannot be co-ordinated in such a 
way as to form true special theories of 
the different beings of the universe, 
until the fundamental distinction between 
the Abstract and Concrete sciences is 
more profoundly felt and more regularly 
organised, and until the scientists who 
are specially devoted to the study of the 
Concrete Sciences recognise the neces- 
sity of founding their researches upon a 
thorough knowledge of all the funda- 
mental Abstract Sciences. The latter is 
a condition which is still very far from 
being properly fulfilled at the present 
day. 

22. Examining this condition, we find 
a confirmatory reason why, in this course 
of Positive Philosophy, we should confine 
ourselves to considering the Abstract or 
General sciences, and not include at the 
same time the Descriptive or Special 
sciences. We discover that a new 
essential property of the study of the 
generalities of Abstract Physics is to 
furnish the rational basis of a truly 
systematic Concrete Physics. In the 
present condition of human intelligence 
there would, therefore, be a species of 
contradiction in wishing to unite the two 
orders of science in a single course. We 
can say, moreover, that, even if Concrete 
Physics had already attained the same 
degree of perfection as Abstract Physics, 
so that it would consequently be possible 
to embrace both at the same time in a 



course of Positive Philosophy, it would 
be evidently none the less necessary to 
commence with the Abstract section, for 
that would remain the invariable base of 
the other. It is clear, besides, that the 
study of the generalities alone of the 
fundamental sciences is so extensive by 
itself that it is important to set aside as 
much as possible all considerations which 
are not indispensable; now, those relating 
to the secondary sciences will always be 
in any case of a distinct order. Since the 
philosophy of the fundamental sciences 
presents a system of positive conceptions 
upon all the categories of real knowledge, 
it is for that reason alone sufficient to 
constitute that First Philosophy which 
Bacon sought for; and, since it is 
destined henceforth to serve as the per- 
manent basis for all human speculations, 
it should be carefully reduced to the 
simplest possible expression. 

23. I need not pursue this argument 
further at present, as I shall have several 
opportunities of recurring to it in the 
different parts of this course. I have 
said enough to explain how and why I 
limit our inquiry. 

24. It follows, then, from the consider- 
ations that have been set forth in this 
chapter : (1) That Human Knowledge as 
a whole being composed of Theoretical 
and of Practical knowledge, we are con- 
cerned here only with the former; (2) 
that Theoretical knowledge, or Science 
properly so-called, being divided into 
General and Special Sciences, we have 
only to consider here the first kind, and, 
interesting as Concrete Physics may be, 
it is to Abstract Physics that we must 
confine ourselves. 

25. The proper subject of this course 
having thus been exactly limited, it is 
now easy to proceed to a really satis- 
factory rational Classification of the 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



49 



Fundamental Sciences, which is the 
encyclopaedic question forming the 
special subject of this chapter. 

26. We must, in the first place, recog- 
nise that, however natural such a Classi- 
fication may be, it necessarily always 
involves something, if not arbitrary, at 
least artificial. It will, therefore, never 
be absolutely perfect 

27. The principal object to be kept 
in view in every attempt at Classification 
is the arrangement of the sciences in the 
order of their natural connection, accord- 
ing to their mutual dependence, so that 
one might be able to present them suc- 
cessively, without ever being in the 
smallest degree involved in a vicious 
circle. Now, that is a condition which 
seems to me impossible to fulfil quite 
rigorously. Perhaps I may be allowed 
here to develop this reflection at some 
length ; it is in my opinion an important 
one, for herein lies the real difficulty of 
the present inquiry. Besides, its treat- 
ment will give me an opportunity of 
establishing, in connection with the 
exposition of our knowledge, a general 
principle which I shall have to apply 
frequently later on. 

28. It is this. Every science can be 
expounded according to two essentially 
distinct methods — the Historical and the 
Dogmatic ; every other mode of exposi- 
tion is only a combination of these 
methods. 

29. By the first method, the knowledge 
is presented in the same order as that in 
which the human mind actually obtained 
it, following as far as possible the actual 
track pursued. 

30. By the second method, the system 
of ideas is presented as it might be con- 
ceived of to-day by a single mind which, 
being placed at the right point of view 
and furnished with sufficient knowledge, 



should apply itself to the reconstruction 
of the science as a whole. 

31. The first mode is evidently that 
by which the study of every new science 
must of necessity commence, because it 
presents the feature of not requiring for 
the exposition of the knowledge any new 
independent work. The didactic art 
reduces itself in that case to the studying 
in chronological order of the different 
original works which have contributed 
to the progress of the science. 

32. The Dogmatic Method supposes, 
on the contrary, that all these individual 
works have been recast into a general 
system, so that they may be presented 
in a more natural logical order ; it is, 
therefore, only applicable to a science 
which has already arrived at a sufficiently 
high degree of development. But in 
proportion as the science progresses, the 
historical order of exposition becomes 
more and more impracticable, owing to 
the lengthy series of intermediate works 
which the mind would be compelled to 
travel over ; whereas the dogmatic order 
becomes more and more possible, and 
at the same time necessary, because new 
conceptions permit the earlier discoveries 
to be presented under a more direct point 
of view. 

33. The education of an ancient 
geometer, for example, consisted simply 
in studying, in due order, the very small 
number of original treatises on the 
different parts of Geometry which then 
existed ; and this amounted to little 
more than the writings of Archimedes 
and Apollonius. On the other hand, 
a modern geometer has usually finished 
his education without having read a 
single original work, except in the case 
of the most recent discoveries which can 
only be known by this means. 

34. The constant tendency of the 



5o 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



human mind in the exposition of its 
knowledge is, therefore, to substitute 
more and more Trig' Duuur atic for the 
Histori ral ATetho rl j thp fnrmpr alone 
being sui ted to th_e __mature state of our 
intelligence. 

35. The general problem of intel- 
lectual education consists in enabling an 
individual of usually but average ability 
to reach in a few years the same stage 
of development which has been attained 
during a long series of ages by the efforts 
of a large number of superior thinkers, 
who have throughout their lives con- 
centrated their attention upon the same 
subject. It is accordingly clear that, 
although it is infinitely easier and quicker 
to learn than to originate, it would be 
quite impossible to attain the desired 
end if we tried to compel each individual 
mind to pass successively through the 
same intermediate stages which the 
collective genius of mankind has neces- 
sarily had to traverse. Hence the indis- 
pensable need for the Dogmatic Method, 
as is especially evident at the present 
day in the most advanced Sciences, the 
ordinary teaching of which shows hardly 
any trace of the actual steps of their 
evolution. 

36. We must, however, add, in order 
to avoid any exaggeration, that every 
actual mode of teaching in use is neces- 
sarily a certain combination of the 
Dogmatic and Historical orders; all 
that the former can claim is a constant 
and increasing predominance. The 
Dogmatic order cannot, indeed, be 
followed quite rigorously, for, as we 
have seen, it implies that the scientific 
truths have not only been discovered, 
but systematically recast. Now, such 
recasting will not, at any given time, 
embrace the truths most recently dis- 
covered. These, therefore, can only be 



taught according to the historical arrange- 
ment, which will not in such cases be 
attended with the chief inconveniences 
that prevent its general adoption. 

37. The only fundamental objection 
which can be urged against the Dogmatic 
Method is, that it leaves the student in 
ignorance of the way in which the 
different Sciences have been built up ; 
a question which, although distinct from 
the actual acquisition of these Sciences, 
is in itself of the highest interest for 
every philosophical mind. This conside- 
ration would, in my opinion, have much 
weight if it was really an argument in 
favour of the Historical order. But it 
is evident that learning the truths of a 
science in their historical order, and 
learning the actual history of that science, 
are two quite different studies, as I shall 
now show. 

38. The different subdivisions of each 
science, which we are led to separate 
in the Dogmatic order, are in reality 
developed simultaneously, and under 
the mutual influence of each other. 
That is a fact which would naturally 
tend to make us prefer the Historical 
order. But when we consider in its 
entirety the actual development of the 
human mind, we see further that the 
different Sciences themselves have, in 
fact, received improvement simul- 
taneously and from one another. We 
even see that there is an interdependence 
between the progress of the Sciences 
and that of the Arts, owing to their 
innumerable reciprocal influences, and, 
finally, that they have all been closely 
connected with the general development 
of human society. This vast interlace- 
ment is so real that, in order to under- 
stand how a scientific theory actually 
arose, it is often necessary to consider 
the improvement in some art which has 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



5i 



no rational link with it, or even some* 
particular progress in social organisation 
without which this discovery could never 
have taken place. We shall see numerous 
examples of this as we proceed. It 
follows from what has been said that 
we can only know the true history of 
each science — that is to say, the way in 
which the discoveries composing it were 
actually made — by making a direct study 
of the general history of humanity. 
That is the reason why all the docu- 
ments hitherto collected on the history 
of Mathematics, Astronomy, Medicine, 
etc., however precious they may be, can 
only be regarded as materials for the 
work. 

39. The professedly historical order 
of exposition, even if it could be 
rigorously followed as regards the details 
of each particular science, would still be 
purely hypothetical and abstract under 
the most important aspect, since it would 
consider the development of the science 
as an isolated thing. Far from exhibiting 
the true history of the science, it would 
lead to a very false conception of it. 

40. I am certainly convinced that a 
knowledge of the history of the Sciences 
is of the highest importance, and I even 
think that a science is not completely 
known if we are ignorant of its history. 
But this historical study of the Sciences 
should be looked upon as entirely sepa- 
rate from its proper and dogmatic study, 
without which, indeed, the history would 
not be intelligible. I shall, therefore, 
carefully consider the true history of the 
fundamental Sciences which are to be the 
subject of our inquiries ; but I shall do 
so only in the last part of this course — 
that relating to the study of Social 
phenomena — in treating of the general 
development of humanity, of which the 
history of the Sciences constitutes the 



most important, although hitherto the 
most neglected, part. In the study of 
each science, such incidental historical 
considerations as may present themselves 
will have a clearly distinct character, so 
as not to affect the main characteristics 
of our principal study. 

41. The preceding discussion in the 
last thirteen paragraphs, which, as we 
see, must be specially developed later 
on, tends to define more precisely the 
true spirit of this course, by presenting 
it under a new point of view. But its 
chief bearing on the question immediately 
before us is that it determines exactly 
the conditions which we must impose 
on ourselves, and which we can justly 
hope to fulfil, in constructing an ency- 
clopaedic scale of the different funda- 
mental Sciences. 

42. We see, indeed, that, however 
perfect we might suppose it to be, this 
Classification can never absolutely con- 
form to the historical succession of the 
Sciences. Do what we may, we cannot 
entirely avoid the necessity of presenting 
as of earlier date a science which may, 
however, under some special aspects 
more or less important, need to borrow 
from the ideas of another science of 
subsequent rank. Only we must take 
care to avoid such derangements with 
respect to the characteristic conceptions 
of each science, for in that case the 
classification would be entirely defective. 

43. Thus, for example, it appears to 
me unquestionable that in the general 
system of the Sciences, Astronomy 
should be placed before Physics (properly 
so-called) ; and yet several branches of 
physics, especially optics, are indispen- 
sable to the complete exposition of 
astronomy. 

44. Minor defects of this kind, which 
are strictly inevitable, cannot invalidate 



52 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



a Classification which in other respects 
suitably fulfils the principal conditions 
of the case. They are due to the neces- 
sarily artificial element in our division 
of intellectual work. 

45. Nevertheless, although for the 
reasons already given it would have 
been improper to take the Historical 
order for the basis of our Classification, 
I claim as an essential quality of the 
encyclopaedic scale, which I am going 
to propose, that it does broadly accord 
with the whole history of science. By 
this I mean that, in spite of the real 
and continuous simultaneity of develop- 
ment of the different Sciences, those 
which will be classed as anterior did, as 
a matter of fact, start earlier, and always 
continued to be more advanced than 
those classed as posterior to them. This 
is what should inevitably occur if we take 
— as clearly we ought to — the natural 
logical connection of the Sciences for 
our principle of classification ; the start- 
ing-point of mankind having necessarily 
been the same as that of the individual. 

46. The exact difficulty of this ques- 
tion of the Classification of the Sciences 
is well illustrated by a very simple 
mathematical consideration, which will 
also serve to sum up all the previous 
arguments in this chapter. 

47. The problem before us is the Clas- 
sification of the Fundamental Sciences. 
We shall soon see that, all things con- 
sidered, it is not possible to distinguish 
less than six of these ; most scientists 
would very likely admit a much larger 
number. That point settled, we know 
that six objects permit of 720 distinct 
classifications, among which we have to 
choose the one classification which best 
satisfies the principal conditions of the 
problem. We see that, in spite of the 
great number of encyclopaedic scales 



successively proposed up to the present, 
the discussion has as yet been confined 
to a very small number of the possible 
arrangements. Nevertheless, I believe 
we can say without any exaggeration 
that, on examining each of the 720 
classifications, there would not perhaps 
be a single one in favour of which we 
could not find some plausible arguments. 
On observing the different arrangements 
which have been actually proposed, we 
remark the most extreme differences 
among them ; Sciences which are 
placed by some at the head of the 
encyclopaedic system being referred by 
others to the opposite extremity, and 
vice versa. The real difficulty of the 
question before us consists, then, in 
choosing the one truly rational order 
out of the very considerable number of 
possible systems. 

48. Approaching this great question 
now in a direct manner, we must, in the 
first place, remember that, in order to 
obtain a natural and positive Classifica- 
tion of the Fundamental Sciences, we 
must seek the principle of it in the 
comparison of the various orders of 
phenomena, the discovery of whose laws 
is the object of those Sciences. What we 
want to determine is the real dependence 
of the different scientific studies. Now, 
this dependence can only result from 
that of the corresponding phenomena. 

49. By considering all observable 
phenomena under this aspect, we shall 
presently see that it is possible to class 
them in a small number of natural cate- 
gories, so arranged that the rational study 
of each category may be founded on a 
knowledge of the principal laws of the 
preceding one, while serving as the basis 
of the following one. This order is 
determined by the degree of simplicity, 
or, what comes to the same thing, of 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



53 



generality of the phenomena. Hence 
results their successive dependence, and, 
consequently, the greater or less facility 
in their study. 

50. It is clear, indeed a priori, that 
the simplest phenomena — those which 
are least complicated by others — are 
necessarily also the most general ; for 
whatever is observed in the greatest 
number of cases is for that reason dis- 
engaged to the utmost degree from the 
circumstances peculiar to each separate 
case. We must, therefore, begin with 
the study of the most general or simple 
phenomena, proceeding from them suc- 
cessively to the most special or complex. 
This is necessary if we wish to compre- 
hend Natural Philosophy in a really 
methodical manner ; because this order 
of generality or simplicity, while it 
necessarily determines the rational con- 
nection of the several fundamental 
Sciences by the successive dependence 
of their phenomena, at the same time 
fixes the degree of facility in their 
study. 

51. There is also a secondary con- 
sideration which is, I think, important 
to notice here, and it leads to exactly 
the same conclusion as the preceding 
arguments. The most general or simple 
phenomena, being of necessity the farthest 
removed from the human order, must, 
consequently, admit of being studied in 
a calmer and more rational frame of 
mind ; that, then, is a further reason why 
the corresponding Sciences have been 
developed more rapidly. 

52. Having thus indicated the funda- 
mental rule which must preside over the 
Classification of the Sciences, I can now 
proceed immediately to the construction 
of the encyclopaedic scale, according to 
which the plan of this course must be 
determined, and which each reader will 



easily be able to appreciate with the aid 
of the preceding considerations. 

53. The first glance at the aggregate 
of Natural Phenomena leads us to divide 
them at starting — in accordance with the 
principle we have just established — into 
two great principal classes, the first com- 
prising all the phenomena of Inorganic 
bodies; the second, all those of Organised 
bodies. 

54. The latter are evidently more 
complex and less general than the others; 
they depend upon the Inorganic, which, 
on the contrary, are in no way dependent 
upon the Organic. Hence arises the 
necessity of not studying physiological 
phenomena until the phenomena of 
inorganic bodies have been dealt with. 
In whatever way we may explain the 
differences between these two kinds of 
beings, it is certain that we observe in 
living bodies all the phenomena, whether 
mechanical or chemical, which occur in 
inorganic bodies, with the addition of a 
wholly special order of phenomena, the 
vital phenomena properly so-called which 
belong to organisation. There is no 
need to ask if the two classes of bodies 
are, or are not, of the same nature — 
that is an insoluble question which is 
still too much debated in our time, 
owing to the lingering influence of Theo- 
logical and Metaphysical habits. Such 
a question does not enter into the domain 
of the Positive Philosophy, which formally 
declares its absolute ignorance as to the 
ultimate nature of any body whatsoever. 
But it is by no means indispensable to 
look upon inorganic and living bodies as 
of essentially different nature, in order 
to recognise the necessity of separating 
the two studies. 

55. No doubt, there is not yet sufficient 
agreement upon the general mode of 
regarding the phenomena of living bodies. 



54 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



But, whatever view may come to be 
adopted owing to the future progress of 
Natural Philosophy, the classification 
which we are establishing will not be in 
any way affected by that. Indeed, if we 
could regard as demonstrated, the idea 
which the present state of Physiology 
hardly affords any justification for — that 
physiological phenomena are always 
simply mechanical, electrical, and 
chemical phenomena modified by the 
structure and composition proper to 
Organised bodies — our fundamental 
division would none the less hold good. 
For it still remains true, even in this 
case, that general phenomena should be 
studied before proceeding to the examina- 
tion of the special modifications which 
they undergo in certain objects of the 
universe, owing to a peculiar arrange- 
ment of their molecules. Most enlightened 
minds at the present day base this 
division upon the dissimilarity of the 
laws concerned ; but it is necessarily a 
permanent one on account of the subor- 
dination of the phenomena, and, con- 
sequently, of the Sciences dealing with 
them, whatever affinity the future may 
establish between these two classes of 
bodies. 

56. This is not the place to develop 
in detail a general comparison between 
inorganic and living bodies, because that 
will be the special subject of a thorough 
examination in the physiological section 
of this work. It is sufficient for the 
present to have recognised in principle 
the logical necessity of separating the 
Sciences relating to these classes of 
phenomena from each other, and of not 
proceeding to the study of Organic 
Physics until we have established the 
general laws of Inorganic Physics. 

57. Each of these two great halves of 
Natural Philosophy can be subdivided 



into two branches. We obtain them by 
a further application of the same general 
rule. 

58. Take, first, Inorganic Physics. 
Following, as before, the order of the 
generality and dependence of the phe- 
nomena, we see, in the first place, that 
it must be divided into two distinct 
sections, according as it deals with phe- 
nomena general to the universe or those 
special to terrestrial bodies. Hence we 
have Celestial Physics, or Astronomy 
(whether geometrical or mechanical), 
and Terrestrial Physics. The necessity 
for the division is exactly the same as 
that of the division into Organic and 
Inorganic. 

59. Astronomical phenomena being 
the most general, simple, and abstract 
of all, the study of Natural Philosophy 
must evidently begin with them ; for the 
laws of Astronomy influence those of all 
other phenomena, but the laws of other 
phenomena do not influence those of 
Astronomy. All the phenomena of 
Terrestrial Physics present the general 
effect of universal gravitation ; they 
present, in addition, other effects peculiar 
to themselves and modifying those of 
gravitation. Hence, if we analyse the 
simplest terrestrial phenomenon — it need 
not be a chemical, it may be a purely 
mechanical one — we always find it to 
be more complex than the most com- 
plicated celestial phenomenon. The 
most difficult astronomical question, 
therefore, really presents a less com- 
plicated subject for investigation, if all 
the determining circumstances be taken 
into account, than the simple movement 
of a heavy body, even if it be only a 
solid. Such a consideration shows 
clearly how indispensable it is to separate 
distinctly Celestial from Terrestrial 
Physics, and only to proceed to the 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



55 



study of the second after that of the 
first, which forms its rational basis. 

60. Terrestrial Physics is, in its turn, 
subdivided in the same manner into 
two very distinct portions, according as 
we regard bodies from the mechanical 
or chemical standpoint- Hence we 
have Physics proper and Chemistry. 
The latter, if it is to be considered in 
a truly logical manner, evidently pre- 
supposes a previous acquaintance with 
Physics. For all chemical phenomena 
are necessarily more complicated than 
physical ones; they depend on the 
physical phenomena without influencing 
them in return. Everyone knows, in 
fact, that all chemical action is, in the 
first place, subject to the influence of 
weight, heat, electricity, etc.; and it 
presents, in addition, something peculiar 
to itself which modifies the action of 
the preceding agents. This considera- 
tion, while it exhibits Chemistry as 
necessarily following after Physics, at 
the same time presents it as a distinct 
science. For whatever opinion we may 
adopt regarding chemical affinity, and 
even if we should only see in it — as 
is conceivable — mere modifications of 
general gravitation produced by the form 
and mutual arrangement of the atoms, 
it would still remain unquestionable that 
the necessity of continually taking these 
special conditions into account would 
not allow of our treating Chemistry as 
a simple appendage to Physics. We 
should, therefore, in any case, be com- 
pelled, if only to facilitate our studies, 
to maintain that division and order of 
succession which are regarded now as 
due to the heterogeneity of the phe- 
nomena. 

61. Such is, then, the rational dis- 
tribution of the principal branches of 
the general Science of Inorganic bodies. 



An analogous division arises in the 
same manner in the general Science of 
Organised bodies. 

62. All living beings present two 
essentially distinct orders of pheno mena — 
those which relate to the individual, and 
those which concern the species, espe- 
cially when it is sociable. It is prin- 
cipally with regard to Man that this 
distinction is fundamental. The last 
order of phenomena is evidently more 
complex and special than the first ; it 
depends on the first without influencing 
it in return. Hence we have two great 
sections in Organic Physics — Physiology 
properly so-called, and Social Physics, 
which is based upon it. 

63. In all Social phenomena we per- 
ceive, in the first place, the influence of 
the physiological laws of the individual, 
and, in addition, something which 
modifies their effect arising from the 
action of the individuals upon each 
other — singularly complicated in the 
case of the human race by the action 
of each generation on its successor. It 
is, therefore, evident that, in order to 
study Social phenomena properly, we 
must start with a good knowledge of the 
laws relating to the life of the individual. 
On the other hand, the necessary subor- 
dination between the two studies does 
not oblige us to regard Social Physics as 
a mere appendage of Physiology, as 
some eminent physiologists have been 
led to believe. Although the phenomena 
are certainly homogeneous, they are not 
identical, and the separation of the two 
Sciences is of the highest importance. 
It would be impossible to treat the 
collective study of the species as a pure 
deduction from the study of the indi- 
vidual, since the social conditions which 
modify the action of the physiological 
laws are here the most essential 



56 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



consideration. Social Physics must, 
therefore, be founded on a set of direct 
observations peculiar to itself; due 
regard being always paid to its neces- 
sarily intimate relation with Physiology 
proper. 

64. If we wanted our Classification to 
be perfectly symmetrical, we could easily 
make a further subdivision of Organic 
Physics, as we have already made of 
Inorganic, by availing ourselves of the 
usual division of Physiology proper into 
Vegetable and Animal. Such a division 
would be based on the principle of 
classification already employed, since 
the phenomena of animal life are, for 
the most part, more complex and special 
than those of vegetable life. But the 
endeavour to obtain such exact symmetry 
would be puerile if it involved the ignoring 
or exaggerating of the real analogies or 
actual differences between phenomena. 
Now, it is certain that the distinction 
between Vegetable and Animal Physio- 
logy, while of great importance in what 
I have called Concrete Physics, has 
hardly any significance in Abstract 
Physics, which alone concerns us here. 
The knowledge of the general laws of 
life, which we should look upon as the 
true object of Physiology, requires the 
simultaneous consideration of the entire 
organic series without any distinction 
between plant and animal — a distinction 
which is, moreover, daily fading away 
in proportion as those phenomena are 
studied more profoundly. 

65. We shall continue, therefore, to 
consider that there is only a single 
division in Organic Physics, although 
we have thought it necessary to establish 
two successive ones in Inorganic Physics. 

66. It follows from the foregoing dis- 
cussion that the Positive Philosophy is 
naturally divided into five Fundamental 



Sciences, whose succession is determined 
by a necessary and invariable subordina- 
tion, founded merely on a thorough com- 
parison of the corresponding phenomena 
— quite apart from any hypothetical view 
on the subject. These Sciences are — 
Astronomy, Physics, Chemistry, Physio- 
logy, and lastly, Social Physics. The 
first considers the most general, simple, 
and abstract phenomena — those which 
are most remote from human interests ; 
they affect all other phenomena, without 
being in turn influenced by them. The 
phenomena considered by the last 
science are, on the contrary, the most 
special, complicated, and concrete phe- 
nomena — those which most directly 
concern human interests ; they depend 
more or less upon all the preceding 
phenomena, without — however — exercis- 
ing any influence upon them. Between 
these two extremes, the degrees of 
speciality, of complexity, and indi- 
viduality of the phenomena go on 
gradually augmenting in the same pro- 
portion as their successive dependence. 
Such is the most essential general rela- 
tion between the different fundamental 
Sciences. We have arrived at it not by 
drawing arbitrary and empty distinctions, 
but by a proper use of true philosophic 
observation. Such must, therefore, be 
the plan of this course. 

67. I have only been able here to set 
forth in outline the principal considera- 
tions on which this Classification rests. 
To comprehend it thoroughly, it would 
now be necessary, having viewed it from 
a general standpoint, to examine it in 
its special relation to each fundamental 
science. We shall do that carefully on 
commencing the special study of each 
part of this course. The revision of the 
encyclopaedic scale, undertaken in this 
way at the commencement of each of 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



57 



the five great Sciences, should make the 
scale itself more exact and its soundness 
more evident. The advantages of this 
plan will be all the clearer because we 
shall then see the subdivisions of each 
science falling naturally into order 
according to the same principle ; so that 
we shall have the whole system of 
human knowledge analysed, even in its 
secondary details, in accordance with a 
rule universally applied — that of the 
degree of abstraction of the corresponding 
conceptions. But studies of this kind, 
besides taking us much too far now, 
would be certainly out of place in this 
chapter, where we should maintain our 
thoughts at the most general standpoint 
of the Positive Philosophy. 

68. Nevertheless, as I shall be con- 
stantly employing this fundamental 
Classification throughout the present 
treatise, I wish from the outset to make 
its importance understood. I will, there- 
fore, rapidly review here its most essential 
general properties. 

69. In the first place, a very decisive 
confirmation of its accuracy is afforded 
by the circumstance that it is in sub- 
stantial conformity with the kind of 
spontaneous arrangement which is, in 
fact, virtually admitted by scientific 
specialists. 

70. Framers of encyclopaedic scales 
usually take no pains to treat as distinct 
those Sciences which, in the actual 
course of intellectual progress and with- 
out any premeditated design, have been 
cultivated separately, and to co-ordinate 
them in conformity with the real rela- 
tions exhibited in their daily develop- 
ment. Yet such an accord is evidently 
the surest index of a good classification ; 
because the divisions which have been 
spontaneously introduced into the 
scientific system can only have been 



due to a long-experienced feeling of the 
true needs of the human mind, a feeling 
which had arisen at a time when there 
was no erroneous theorising to lead 
people astray. 

71. But although the Classification 
proposed above fulfils this condition 
entirely — a fact which it would be super- 
fluous to prove — we must not, therefore, 
conclude that the habits generally estab- 
lished at the present day among scientists, 
as the result of experience, would make 
the work of classification, which I have 
just performed, unnecessary. They have 
only rendered such an operation pos- 
sible, for there is a fundamental differ- 
ence between an arrangement only 
reached empirically and the same 
arrangement conceived rationally. And, 
besides, this classification is not usually 
conceived — still less employed — with all 
the needful precision, nor is its impor- 
tance properly appreciated ; a sufficient 
proof of that is the serious breaches of 
this encyclopaedic law which are com- 
mitted every day to the great detriment 
of the human intellect. 

72. A second very essential character 
of our Classification is that it necessarily 
conforms to the actual order of develop- 
ment of Natural Philosophy. This fact 
is verified by all that we know of the 
history of the Sciences, especially during 
the last two centuries, where we can 
follow their progress with much greater 
accuracy. 

73. We see, in fact, that the rational 
study of each fundamental Science 
demanded the previous study of all 
those which preceded it in our encyclo- 
paedic scale ; it could not, therefore, 
make any real progress and acquire its 
true character until there had been a 
considerable development of the earlier 
Sciences, dealing with phenomena more- 



53 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



general and more abstract, but less 
complex, and not dependent on those 
later than themselves. It is, therefore, 
in this order that the progress, although 
simultaneous, was bound to take place. 

74. This consideration seems to me 
so important that I do not think it is 
possible really to understand the history 
of the human mind without paying 
regard to it. The general Law of the 
Three Stages, which governs the whole 
of this history, and which was explained 
in the preceding chapter, cannot be 
properly understood unless it be applied 
in combination with the encyclopaedic 
formula just established. For it is 
according to the order enunciated by 
this formula that the different human 
theories have successively attained, first 
the Theological, then the Metaphysical, 
and, finally, the Positive state. If, in 
applying the law, we do not bear in 
mind this necessary progression, we 
shall often encounter difficulties which 
will appear insurmountable. It is clear 
that the Theological or Metaphysical 
state of certain fundamental theories 
was bound to coincide for a time, and, 
as a matter of fact, has at times coin- 
cided, with the Positive state of others 
which precede them in our encyclopaedic 
system. To verify the fundamental law 
of Filiation would, therefore, be difficult, 
did we not at the same time take into 
account the complementary law of 
Classification. 

75. In the third place, this Classi- 
fication presents the very remarkable 
property of indicating in a precise 
manner the relative perfection of the 
different Sciences. They approach per- 
fection in proportion as their truths are 
more precisely known and completely 
co-ordinated. 

76. It is easy to see, indeed, that the 



more general, simple, and abstract any 
phenomena are, the less do they depend 
on others, and the more precise do the 
Sciences concerned with them become, 
while at the same time their co-ordina- 
tion admits of greater perfection. Thus, 
Organic phenomena do not permit of 
such an exact and systematic study as 
the phenomena of Unorganised bodies. 
In the same way, in Inorganic Physics, 
we see that Celestial phenomena, on 
account of their much greater generality 
and their independence of all other 
phenomena, have given rise to a much 
more precise and closely connected 
Science than Terrestrial Physics. 

77. This fact, which is such a striking 
one in the actual study of the Sciences, 
and has often given rise to chimerical 
hopes or unjust comparisons, is then 
completely explained by the encyclo- 
paedic order now established. I shall 
naturally have occasion to give it its 
full extension in the next chapter, when 
I shall show that the possibility of 
applying mathematical analysis to the 
study of different phenomena, and so 
obtaining for such study the highest 
possible degree of precision and co- 
ordination, is in exact proportion to the 
rank which these phenomena occupy in 
my encyclopaedic scale. 

78. I must here put the reader on 
his guard against a very serious error, 
which, although gross, is still extremely 
common. It consists in confounding 
the degree of precision which the 
different Sciences admit of with their 
degree of certitude, whence results the 
very dangerous assumption that, since 
the first is obviously very unequal, the 
second must be so also. Thus people 
still often speak, although less than 
formerly, of the unequal certainty of 
the different Sciences, which tends to 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



59 



directly discourage the culture of the 
most difficult ones. It is clear, never- 
theless, that precision and certainty are 
two qualities of very different nature. 
A wholly absurd proposition may be 
very precise, as if we should say, for 
example, that the sum of the angles of 
a triangle is equal to three right angles ; 
and a very certain proposition may only 
admit of very imperfect precision, as 
for instance, when we affirm that every 
man will die. If, as the preceding 
explanation shows, the different Sciences 
must necessarily exhibit a very unequal 
degree of precision, that is by no means 
the case as regards their certitude. 
Each can offer results as certain as 
those of any other Science, provided 
that its conclusions are not pushed 
beyond the degree of precision which 
the corresponding phenomena admit of, 
a condition which may not be always 
very easy to fulfil. In any Science what- 
ever, everything that is simply conjectural 
is only more or less probable, and it is 
not that which constitutes its essential 
domain ; everything which is positive — 
that is to say, founded on well-established 
facts — is certain, and there is not any 
distinction between the Sciences in this 
respect. 

79. Finally, the most interesting pro- 
perty of our encyclopaedic formula — on 
account of the importance and multi- 
plicity of the immediate applications 
which can be made of it — is to determine 
directly the true general plan of an 
entirely rational Scientific Education. 
That follows immediately from the mere 
composition of the formula. 

80. It is, indeed, evident that, before 
undertaking the methodical study of 
any of the fundamental Sciences, it is 
necessary to prepare oneself by the 
examination of the Sciences preceding 



it in our encyclopaedic scale. The 
reason for this is that the earlier Sciences 
have always a preponderating influence 
upon the later ones. This consideration 
is so striking that, notwithstanding its 
extreme practical importance, I have no 
need to insist further just now upon 
a principle which, moreover, will later on 
inevitably recur in relation to each funda- 
mental Science. I will confine myself 
to the remark that, if it is eminently 
applicable to general education, it is 
particularly so to the special education 
of scientists. 

81. Thus, physicists who have not 
first studied Astronomy, at least under 
its general aspect ; chemists who, before 
applying themselves to their special 
science, have not previously studied 
Astronomy and then Physics ; physio- 
logists who have not prepared themselves 
for their special labours by a preliminary 
study of Astronomy, Physics, and 
Chemistry; all these lack one of the 
fundamental conditions of their intel- 
lectual development. This is still more 
evident in the case of students who wish 
to devote themselves to the positive study 
of Social phenomena, without having in 
the first place acquired a general know- 
ledge of Astronomy, Physics, Chemistry, 
and Physiology. 

82. As these conditions are very rarely 
fulfilled at present, and as no regular 
institution has been organised to carry 
them out, we must acknowledge that no 
truly rational education yet exists for 
scientists. This consideration is, in my 
opinion, of such great importance that I 
do not hesitate to attribute in part to 
this defect in our present educational 
system the state of extreme imperfection 
which we still witness in the more diffi- 
cult Sciences — an inferiority really so 
excessive that it cannot be entirely 



6o 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



accounted for by the greater complexity 
of the phenomena. 

83. As regards general education, this 
condition is still more necessary. I 
regard it as so indispensable that I 
believe instruction in the Sciences will 
fail to bring about its most essential 
general purpose — the intellectual and 
social ascendency of the scientific spirit 
— unless those Sciences are studied in 
their proper order. We must not forget 
that in almost all minds, even the 
highest, ideas usually remain associated 
together according to the order in which 
they were first acquired ; and it is, con- 
sequently, in most cases an irremediable 
evil not to have commenced at the 
beginning. The number of persons in 
any century who, after arriving at man- 
hood, are able, like Bacon, Descartes, and 
Leibnitz, to make a clean sweep of their 
acquired ideas and reconstruct them 
systematically from the foundation, is 
small indeed. 

84. The importance of our encyclo- 
paedic law as a basis for Scientific Edu- 
cation can only be properly appreciated 
by considering it also in relation to 
Method, instead of only regarding it, as 
we have hitherto done, from the stand- 
point of Doctrine. 

85. Under this new aspect, the carrying 
out of the general plan of education 
which we have laid down must have as 
its necessary result the acquisition of a 
perfect knowledge of the Positive 
Method, which could not be obtained 
in any other manner. 

86. For Natural Phenomena have 
been classed in such a way that those 
which are really homogeneous always 
remain comprised within the same 
Science, while those which belong to 
different Sciences are really hetero- 
geneous. The consequence is that the 



general Positive Method will be con- 
stantly modified in an uniform manner 
throughout the extent of each funda- 
mental Science ; and it will be con- 
tinually undergoing different modifica- 
tions of increasing complexity, in passing 
from one Science to another. In this 
way we shall be certain of having con- 
sidered all the real modifications which 
it admits of. We should have no such 
certainty if we adopted an encyclopaedic 
formula which did not fulfil the essential 
conditions laid down above. 

87. This new consideration is of 
truly fundamental importance. As we 
saw, in a general way, in the last chapter, 
it is impossible to understand the Posi- 
tive Method apart from its application, 
and we must now add that we can only 
form a clear and exact idea of it by 
studying successively in due order its 
application to all the different principal 
classes of Natural Phenomena. No one 
Science, however well chosen, would be 
sufficient for the attainment of this 
object. Of course, the Method is essen- 
tially the same in all. But it has various 
forms of procedure, each of which is 
specially developed in some one Science, 
and being less developed in the others 
would in them escape notice. Thus, for 
instance, the principal means of explora- 
tion in some Sciences is Observation 
properly so-called ; in others it is Experi- 
ment, and a particular kind of Experi- 
ment. Similarly we notice that this or 
that general precept, forming an integral 
part of the Scientific Method, has been 
originally suggested by some particular 
Science; and, although it may have 
been subsequently applied in others, it 
is at its original source that we must 
study it, if we would know it thoroughly. 
The Theory of Classification, for instance, 
is best studied in Biology. 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



61 



88. If we limited ourselves to the 
study of a single Science, we should, no 
doubt, choose the most perfect one in 
order to obtain the best idea of the 
Positive Method. But, as the most 
perfect is at the same time the simplest, 
we should in this way only obtain a very 
incomplete knowledge of the Method, 
since we should not learn what essential 
modifications it must undergo in order 
to adapt it to more complex phenomena. 
Each fundamental Science has, there- 
fore, in this respect some advantages 
which are peculiar to it. This clearly 
shows the necessity of paying regard to 
all of them, lest we should form too 
narrow conceptions and inadequate 
mental habits. As this consideration 
will frequently recur in the course of the 
work, it is unnecessary to develop it 
further at this stage. 

89. I must, nevertheless, insist here 
specially, with a view to a sound know- 
ledge of the Method, on the need of 
not only studying all the fundamental 
Sciences in a philosophical manner, but 
of studying them according to the ency- 
clopaedic order established in this chapter. 
How can a mind, unless of the highest 
natural superiority, produce anything of 
value if it begins by studying the most 
complex phenomena, without having 
previously learnt to know by examining 
simpler phenomena — what a Law is, 
what it is to Observe, what a Positive 
Conception is, and even what a Con- 
nected Argument is ? Such is, however, 
still at the present day the ordinary pro- 
cedure with our young physiologists, 
who plunge immediately into the study 
of living bodies, without, as a rule, any 
other preparation than the study of one 
or two dead languages, with at most only 
a very superficial knowledge of Physics 
and Chemistry. The latter knowledge 



is almost valueless from the standpoint 
of Method, since it has not been usually 
obtained in a rational manner, or by 
starting from the true point of departure 
in Natural Philosophy. We can see 
how important it is to reform such a 
defective course of study. In the same 
way, with regard to Social phenomena, 
which are still more complicated, would 
it not be taking an important step towards 
the return of modern society to a truly 
normal state, if we recognised the logical 
necessity of not proceeding to the study 
of these phenomena until the mind of 
the student has been gradually trained 
by a philosophical examination of all 
the preceding phenomena? It would 
be quite true to say that this constitutes 
the principal difficulty, for there are few 
able minds at the present day which are 
not convinced that we must study Social 
phenomena according to the Positive 
Method. But those who are engaged 
in this study do not, and cannot, know 
exactly in what this Method consists, 
because they have not examined it in its 
earlier applications. This maxim has, 
therefore, up to the present remained 
barren as regards the renovation of Social 
theories, which have not yet emerged 
from the Theological or Metaphysical 
state, in spite of the efforts of so-called 
positive reformers. Later on, this con- 
sideration will be treated in full ; at 
present I must confine myself to pointing 
it out, so as to show the whole scope of 
the encyclopaedic conception which has 
been propounded in this chapter. 

90. Such are, then, the four principal 
aspects under which I have thought it 
necessary to exhibit the general impor- 
tance of the rational and positive Classi- 
fication of the Fundamental Sciences. 

91. In order to complete the general 
explanation of the plan of this course, 



62 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



I have now to consider an immense and 
all-important gap which has been inten- 
tionally left in my encyclopaedic formula ; 
it is an omission which the reader has, 
no doubt, already noticed. I refer to 
the fact that we have not yet found a 
place for Mathematics in our scientific 
system. 

92. It is just because of its importance 
that I have not yet mentioned this great 
and fundamental Science. The next 
chapter will be entirely devoted to the 
exact determination of its true general 
character, and, consequently, of its 
encyclopaedic rank. But, in order not 
to leave such a serious blank in the 
great plan which I have tried to sketch 
out in this chapter, a summary account 
must be given here of the general results 
of the examination which we shall under- 
take in the following chapter. 

93. In the present state of develop- 
ment of our positive knowledge we 
must, I think, look upon Mathematics, 
not so much as a constituent part of 
Natural Philosophy properly so-called, 
but as having been since Descartes and 
Newton the true fundamental basis of 
the whole of that philosophy ; although 
it is, strictly speaking, both one and the 
other. At the present time, indeed, 
Mathematical Science is of much less 
importance for the knowledge of which 
it consists — real and valuable as that 
knowledge is — than as constituting the 
most powerful instrument which the 
human mind can employ in investigating 
the laws of Natural Phenomena. 

94. To form in this respect a perfectly 
clear and rigorously exact conception of 
Mathematics, we see that it must be 
divided into two great sciences whose 
character is essentially distinct : Abstract 
Mathematics or the Calculus — using that 
word in its widest sense — and Concrete 



Mathematics, which is composed of 
General Geometry and of Rational 
Mechanics. The Concrete part is neces- 
sarily founded on the Abstract part, and 
it becomes in its turn the direct basis of 
all Natural Philosophy; all the pheno- 
mena of the universe being regarded, as 
far as possible, as either Geometrical or 
Mechanical. 

95. The Abstract part is the only 
portion which is purely instrumental, 
being simply an immense and admirable 
extension of natural logic to a certain 
order of deductions. Geometry and 
Mechanics must, on the contrary, be 
regarded as true Natural Sciences, 
founded like all others on observation ; 
although, on account of the extreme 
simplicity of their phenomena, they admit 
of an infinitely more perfect degree of 
systematisation, which has sometimes 
led to the experimental character of 
their first principles being too much lost 
sight of. But these two principal 
sciences possess this peculiarity — that in 
the present state of the human mind 
they are already, and will be more and 
more, employed as Method rather than 
as direct Doctrine. 

96. It is besides evident that, in thus 
placing Mathematical Science at the 
head of Positive Philosophy, we are 
only making a further application of the 
same principle of classification which 
has furnished us with the encyclopaedic 
series established in this chapter — a 
principle founded on the successive 
dependence of the Sciences, which 
results from the more or less abstract 
character of the phenomena they deal 
with. We are now only restoring to 
this series its true first term, the peculiar 
importance of which demanded a special 
and fuller examination. We see, in 
fact, that Geometrical and Mechanical 



CLASSIFICATION OF THE POSITIVE SCIENCES 



63 



phenomena are the most general, simple, 
abstract, and irreducible of all, and that 
they do not depend on the others, but, 
on the contrary, are their basis. We 
also see that their study is an indispen- 
sable preliminary to that of all the other 
orders of phenomena. It is, therefore, 
Mathematical Science which must con- 
stitute the true starting-point of all 
rational scientific education, whether 
general or special. This explains the 
universal custom which has been for a 
long while established on this subject in 
an empirical manner, although it had 
originally no other origin than the greater 
relative antiquity of Mathematics. I 
must confine myself for the present to 
this very rapid sketch of these different 
considerations ; they will form the special 
subject of the following chapter. 

97. In this chapter, then, we have 
exactly determined the rational plan 
which should constantly guide us in the 
study of Positive Philosophy, not 
deducing it from vague arbitrary specu- 
lations, but regarding the question as 
the subject of a true philosophical 
problem. As the final result we have 
— Mathematics, Astronomy, Physics, 
Chemistry, Physiology, and Social 
Physics. That is the encyclopaedic 
formula which, among the numerous 
possible classifications of the six Funda- 
mental Sciences, is the only one con- 



forming logically to the natural and 
invariable order of phenomena. I need 
not dwell on the importance of this 
result. The reader must make himself 
quite familiar with it, for he will have to 
be constantly applying it throughout this 
course. 

98. The final result of this chapter, 
to put it most simply, has been to 
explain and justify the great Synoptical 
Table placed at the beginning of the 
present work, in constructing which I 
have striven to arrange the subdivisions 
of each Fundamental Science in as clear 
conformity as possible with the same 
principle of Classification which has 
given us the general series of the Sciences. 



NOTE BY THE TRANSLATOR. 

(1) The word " Physiology" in this translation 
must be considered as invariably equivalent to 
the term " Biology"; and the latter word was 
actually employed by Comte in Vol. III. of the 
Philosophie Positive (1838). 

(2) In 1839, in Vol. IV. of the Philosophie 
Positive, we find Comte using, for the first time, 
the word "Sociology" in preference to the 
expression "Social Physics." It is, therefore, 
to Comte that we are indebted for the now 
universally-adopted name of " Sociology." 

(3) The reader will notice that in the Synop- 
tical Table only six fundamental sciences are 
given ; the crowning science of Morals or Ethics 
was not separated from Sociology by Comte 
until the publication of Vol. II. of the Politique 
Positive in 1852. 



> 



DATE DUE 




DATE DUE 







































































































B2222 
1905* 











STACKS B2222 1905x 

Comte, Auguste, 

Th« fundamental principles of the positi 




3 5282 00156 6804 




i 





